



 Stock Quotes and Investment Research  -- Quicken® Investing Center







| Quicken
















 












Skip to main content






Quicken Logo




Quicken Logo








United StatesCanada

 



            Cart            



Sign InMy Account
Investment Portfolio

 









You are here









Loading... 











10-K: YUMMY FLIES, INC. - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,830
+33.76
+0.15%






Nasdaq

6,375
-7.51
-0.12%






S&P 500

2,472
-3.32
-0.13%









12:33 A.M. ET


Breaking
      Elon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range
                                





 
12:20 A.M. ET


                                  Tesla: Standard Model 3 will cost $35,000, long-range model will cost $44,000
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
                                





 
7/28


                                  Barron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
                                





 
7/28


                                  A Wild Week in Washington 
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      The dark side of cruises
                                





 
7/28


                                   Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Here are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Top 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      This is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Paint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Americans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Beyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      These 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Watch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-K: YUMMY FLIES, INC.
    








    By

Published: Apr 14, 2016 5:01 p.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS  The following discussion should be read in conjunction with our audited financial statements and notes thereto included herein. In connection with, and because we desire to take advantage of, the "safe harbor" provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we caution readers regarding certain forward looking statements in the following discussion and elsewhere in this Report and in any other statement made by, or on our behalf, whether or not in future filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Forward looking statements are statements not based on historical information and which relate to future operations, strategies, financial results or other developments. Forward looking statements are necessarily based upon estimates and assumptions that are inherently subject to significant business, economic and competitive uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond our control and many of which, with respect to future business decisions, are subject to change. These uncertainties and contingencies can affect actual results and could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in any forward looking statements made by, or on our behalf. We disclaim any obligation to update forward looking statements.  Overview  Yummy Flies, Inc., ("we," "our" or the "Company") was incorporated on December 26, 2005, in the State of Colorado under the name "Yummieflies.com Inc." In March 2010 we filed an amendment to our Articles of Incorporation changing our name to "Yummy Flies, Inc." In September 2010, we engaged in a forward split of our issued and outstanding Common Stock whereby nine (9) shares of Common Stock were issued in exchange for every one (1) share then issued and outstanding. All references to our issued and outstanding Common Stock in this Report are presented on a post-forward split basis unless otherwise indicated.  Since inception our business has been to establish an on-line fly fishing company, specializing in marketing trout flies. We also plan to market a series of fly tying DVD's. Our principal marketing efforts are directed to the post-war "Baby Boomers."  We have never been subject to any bankruptcy proceeding.  Our executive offices are located at 1848 South Lamar Ct., Lakewood, CO 80232, telephone (303) 619-2503.  Our cost of sales during the fiscal years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014 was $42 and $0, respectively. Consequently, our gross profit for the fiscal years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014 was $868 and $0, respectively.  Our general and administrative expense during our fiscal year ended December 31, 2015 was $24,581, compared to $53,529 during our fiscal year ended December 31, 2014, a decrease of $28,948. This decrease was primarily as a result of reduced legal fees incurred during 2015.  As a result, we incurred a net loss of $28,832 during the year ended December 31, 2015 (less than $0.01 per share) compared to a net loss of $53,529 during the year ended December 31, 2014.  The following is our Plan of Operation.  - 15 -  Plan of Operation  We are currently marketing a series of fly fishing flies under the titles of "Yummy Tandem Flies," "Natural Selection" and "Canyon Magic." We attempt to create our flies with a degree of realism. Specifically, most flies are tied with thread, dubbing and feathers and fur. Our "Natural Selection" flies are tied with latex and microfibetts to form a smooth, translucent body, with realistic wings and legs. The Tandem Flies are tied with two and even three bodies of nymphs and/or larva flies on the same hook shank. Traditional flies are tied one fly body at a time on the hook. Each series is tied by one of our founders. In addition, we have produced a series of five fly tying DVDs entitled "The Natural Selections Series" which demonstrates how to tie our line of realistic midge; mysis shrimp, caddis, baetis, and scud patterns. A DVD was initially produced on a limited run basis by Mr. Yamauchi to test the viability of marketing a series of Fly Tying DVD's that showed how to tie his signature patterns. This was marketed at the International Sportsman Expo in Denver, Colorado in 2006 and at the West Denver Trout Unlimited annual Fly Tying Clinic held in 2007. We intend to place all of our videos in area fly shops during 2015. However, as of the date of this Report we have no arrangement with any area fly shops to sell our DVD's.  As stated above, we estimate we will require up to $500,000 in additional capital in order to fully implement our business plan as described in this Report. These funds are proposed to be utilized for our development and expansion from just a retail web based business to a retail and wholesale operation, including the following proposed use of proceeds: (i) approximately $100,000 to purchase raw materials that we utilize in the manufacturing of our flies in bulk, including hooks, latex gloves and other related materials. Included in this category would be the identification of a manufacturer who can produce our custom made ties in bulk by developing and utilizing injection molding with soft polyurethane plastics and polmers, in order to establish an expanded inventory of our ties. We currently do not have the capacity to fill a large order that we might receive from a large retail fishing business; (ii) $50,000 for the development and marketing of additional DVD's; (iii) approximately $100,000 to increase our inventory of custom ties, including the development of relationships with other established ties designers and retention of additional employees to assist in these expanded operations. It is anticipated that these new employees will have accounting experience, as well as sales and marketing experience; (iv) approximately $25,000 for expansion of our existing website from a retail based marketing vehicle into a retail and wholesale marketing operation; and (v) approximately $100,000 to accomplish the acquisition of related businesses and provide working capital to these business upon acquisition. The balance of funds ($125,000) would be utilized for working capital. If we can raise only between $100,000 and $200,000, we believe we can successfully accomplish the objectives outlined in (i) and (iii) and become profitable. Once profitable, we believe there are opportunities that will arise to expand our business without this additional capital, but over a longer period of time. This includes acquiring competitors in exchange for issuance of our securities. However, there can be no assurances that we will be able to raise the capital required to accomplish these objectives, or if we are so successful in raising such capital, that we will be able to implement our business plan. See "Part I, Item 1, BUSINESS."  We estimate that it will take approximately 3 years for us to accomplish all of the objectives described in the preceding paragraph, provided that we are able to raise $500,000. We believe the most time consuming aspect of our business plan is the identification of a manufacturing entity, either in the US or overseas, that can develop the molds and then begin manufacturing our ties to our specifications. We estimate that this will take a minimum of two years. Following this development we also estimate that it will take another year in which to develop the sales and marketing to sell these products. As previously stated, there are no assurances that our estimates are accurate, or that we will be able to raise the funds necessary to accomplish these objectives.  Because of our relatively low cost of operations we believe that if we are only able to raise between $100,000 and $200.000, we will continue to be a retail web based business, but we will not be able to afford expanding into the wholesale market. While no assurances can be provided, with an additional $100,000 in equity capital we believe we would be able to successfully increase our inventory of fishing flies and as a result, we believe that the revenues generated from the sale of these flies will be sufficient to allow us to break even or generate nominal profits. There can be no assurances that this will occur.  For a more detailed description of our business and its development, see "Part I, Item 1, BUSINESS," hereinabove.  - 16 -  Liquidity and Capital Resources  At December 31, 2015, we had $714 in cash.  Net cash used in operating activities was $2,771 during the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015, compared to $6,531 during 2014. We anticipate that overhead costs in current operations will increase in the future as a result of our anticipated increased marketing activities.  Cash flows provided or used in investing activities were $0 during the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014.  Cash flows provided or used by financing activities were $3,234 and $5,525 during 2015 and 2014, respectively, and related to advances we received from one of our shareholders  To date, our operations have been limited and we have generated limited revenues. We believe that our principal difficulty has been the lack of available capital to operate and expand our business. We believe we need a minimum of approximately $100,000 in additional working capital to be utilized for marketing and sales of our existing products, including hiring a marketing/sales person, advertising brochures and a presence at fly shows (booth space) (estimated cost of $35,000), generate an inventory of DVD's and flies ($35,000) and develop a marketing kit for distribution ($20,000, with the balance for working capital and general and administrative expense. As described above under "Plan of Operation" we also believe we will require a total of up to $500,000 in additional capital to fully implement our business plan, as described herein. While no assurances can be provided, we believe that if we are only able to raise $100,000 we should be able to successfully increase our inventory of fishing flies and as a result, we believe that the revenues generated from the sale of these flies will be sufficient to allow us to continue to grow. See "Part I, Item 1, Business." We lack a market presence that is needed in order for us to succeed. As of the date of this Report we have no commitment from any investor or investment-banking firm to provide us with the necessary funding and there can be no assurances we will obtain such funding in the future. Failure to obtain this additional financing will have a material negative impact on our ability to generate profits in the fututed  Inflation  Although our operations are influenced by general economic conditions, we do not believe that inflation had a material effect on our results of operations during the year ended December 31, 2015.  Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates  Critical Accounting Estimates  The discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. The preparation of these financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and related disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. On an on-going basis, we evaluate our estimates based on historical experience and on various other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities that are not readily apparent from other sources. Actual results may differ from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions. The following represents a summary of our critical accounting policies, defined as those policies that we believe are the most important to the portrayal of our financial condition and results of operations and that require management's most difficult, subjective or complex judgments, often as a result of the need to make estimates about the effects of matters that are inherently uncertain.  Leases - We follow the guidance in SFAS No. 13 "Accounting for Leases," as amended, which requires us to evaluate the lease agreements we enter into to determine whether they represent operating or capital leases at the inception of the lease.  - 17 -  Recent Accounting Pronouncements  Under the Jumpstart Our Business Startups Act, or the JOBS Act, we meet the definition of an "emerging growth company." We have irrevocably elected to opt out of the extended transition period for complying with new or revised accounting standards pursuant to Section 107(b) of the JOBS Act. As a result, we will comply with new or revised accounting standards on the relevant dates on which adoption of such standards is required for non- emerging growth companies  Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements  We have not entered into any off-balance sheet arrangements that have or are reasonably likely to have a current or future effect on our financial condition, changes in financial condition, revenues or expenses, results of operations, liquidity, capital expenditures or capital resources and would be considered material to investors.  Apr 14, 2016  (c) 1995-2016 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Elon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range


Paint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400


Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials















Most Popular





Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials





Kellyanne Conway suggests Hillary Clinton’s language is more vulgar than Anthony Scaramucci’s





Elon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range





Paint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400





Silicon Valley's corporate-campus building boom is a cautionary tale




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 





















Yummy Flies, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 29, 2017 4:26 AM ET
Leisure Products

Company Overview of Yummy Flies, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
As of July 18, 2016, Yummy Flies, Inc. was acquired by Pura Naturals Inc., in a reverse merger transaction. Yummy Flies, Inc., a development stage company, operates as an on-line fly fishing company in the United States. It produces and distributes flies and other fishing supplies, and instructional fly tying DVD's. The company markets its fly fishing flies under the titles of Yummy Tandem Flies, Natural Selection, and Canyon Magic. It also retails GigBob, a personal watercraft through its Website. The company was formerly known as Yummyflies.com, Inc. and changed its name to Yummy Flies, Inc. in March 2010. Yummy Flies, Inc. was founded in 2005 and is based in Lakewood, Colorado.


1848 South Lamar Ct.Lakewood, CO 80232United StatesFounded in 20053 Employees



Phone: 303-619-2503








Key Executives for Yummy Flies, Inc.


Yummy Flies, Inc. does not have any Key Executives recorded. 



Yummy Flies, Inc. Key Developments

Yummy Flies, Inc. Announces Management Changes
Jul 26 16
Yummy Flies, Inc. announced that effective July 18, 2016, Mr. Gary Okizaki resigned as Chief Executive Officer and member of the Board, and Brian Yamauchi and Monroe Coleman resigned as officers and directors of the company. Effective July 18, 2016, Mr. James Kordenbrock was appointed as Chief Executive Officer and as a member of the Board, Mr. Robert Doherty was appointed President and Chief Financial Officer and as a member of the board, Mr. Robert Switzer was appointed Secretary and as a member of the board. Mr. Kordenbrock was a military officer for six years and Captain in the United States Army, serving as a Cobra attack helicopter aviator, leading organizations of hundreds both in the air and on the ground. Mr. Doherty is a seasoned business and technology senior executive with expertise in manufacturing, operations and engineering. He has successfully led global businesses and has a proven track record of consistently exceeding revenue and profit objectives. Mr. Doherty is a proven expert in translating broad strategies into specific objectives/plans and successfully translating those objectives into action and quantifiable results. Mr. Switzer has 25 years of experience in business and executive management, with particular expertise and passion for start-ups. Through the years, Mr. Switzer has gained vast experience in a wide array of business matters for companies of all sizes.


Yummy Flies, Inc. announced delayed 10-Q filing
May 17 16
On 05/17/2016, Yummy Flies, Inc. announced that they will be unable to file their next 10-Q by the deadline required by the SEC.


Yummy Flies, Inc. announced delayed annual 10-K filing
Mar 30 16
On 03/30/2016, Yummy Flies, Inc. announced that they will be unable to file their next 10-K by the deadline required by the SEC.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 111616 Eis (delaware) Inc. United States 111616 Opco (delaware) Inc. United States 21st Century Toys, Inc. United States 2nd Skull LLC United States 4D Seismic, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Yummy Flies, Inc., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Yummy Flies, Inc.: CEO and Executives - Bloomberg








































  





















































































July 29, 2017 4:26 AM ET
Leisure Products

Company Overview of Yummy Flies, Inc.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Key Executives for Yummy Flies, Inc.
NameBoard RelationshipsTitleAgeThere is no Key Executives data available.
Yummy Flies, Inc. Board Members*
NameBoard RelationshipsPrimary CompanyAgeThere is no Board Members data available.
Yummy Flies, Inc. Executive Committees*
Committee NameChairpersonBoard RelationshipsMembersThere is no committee data available.
*Data is at least as current as the most recent Definitive Proxy.
Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



CEO COMPENSATION IN THIS INDUSTRY  Industry Range










INDUSTRY EXECUTIVE CHANGESThere is no Executive Change data available.Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Yummy Flies, Inc., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




4:26 AM EDT
July 29, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:34aBREAKINGElon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range
12:21aTesla: Standard Model 3 will cost $35,000, long-range model will cost $44,000
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































Yummy Flies, Inc.                                                                                                        - Lakewood                                          , CO         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



CO



Lakewood



Business Services, Nec



Business Services At Non-commercial Site



                            Yummy Flies, Inc.
                                    



 





















Y 


Yummy Flies, Inc.                                                                                                       
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



1848 S LAMAR CT LAKEWOOD, CO 80232
Get Directions



(303) 619-2503
www.yummyflies.com                                                                                      





Business Info



 Founded 2010
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $910.00
 Employee Count 1
 Industries Business Services At Non-commercial Site
 Contacts Gary Okizaki                                                                                                            







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2010, Yummy Flies, Inc.                                                                                                        has been providing Business Services At Non-commercial Site from Lakewood. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







Y

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















 Yummy Flies, Inc. (Form: 8-K, Received: 07/26/2016 06:03:05) 











	 













	UNITED STATES



	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION



	Washington, D.C. 20549


	 


	FORM 8-K


	 


	CURRENT REPORT



	PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE



	SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934


	Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):

	July 18, 2016














	YUMMY FLIES, INC.



	(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)


	 


	 







	 


	COLORADO


	 




	 




	 


	000-54888


	 




	 




	 


	20-8496798


	 








	 


	(State or Other Jurisdiction



	of Incorporation)


	 




	 




	 


	(Commission File Number)


	 




	 




	 


	(I.R.S. Employer



	Identification No.)


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	23101 Lake Center Drive, Suite 100


	 




	 


	Lake Forest, CA 92630


	 








	 


	(Address of Principal Executive Offices)



	(Zip Code)


	 










	 



	(855) 326-8537




	(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)


	 


	N/A



	(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)


	 







	 


	 


	 



	 


	Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:


	 


	☐ Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)


	☐ Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)


	☐ Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))


	☐ Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))







	 


	 


	 




























	 


	 


	Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.







	Share Exchange Agreement





	Effective July 18, 2016 (the "Closing Date"), Yummy Flies, Inc. (the "Company") entered into that certain Share Exchange Agreement (the "Share Exchange Agreement") by and among the Company, Pura Naturals, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("PURA") and certain shareholders of PURA (the "PURA Shareholders").  Pursuant to the Share Exchange Agreement, the Company agreed to exchange the outstanding common and preferred stock of PURA held by the PURA Shareholders for shares of common stock of the Company on approximately a 1:4.2 basis, (after giving effect to certain share cancellations).  At the Closing Date, Robert Lee, the holder of 8,289,000 shares of common stock, agreed to cancelation of such shares.  Other than Robert Lee, shareholders of Company common stock held approximately 1,926,000 shares.  Also on the Closing Date, the Company issued approximately 6,267,000 shares of common stock to the PURA shareholders.   In addition, shares issuable under outstanding options of PURA will be exercisable into shares of common stock of the Company, pursuant to the terms of such instruments.  The shares of PURA common stock issuable upon exercise of options will be exchanged for approximately 470,000 Shares of the Company's common stock, par value $0.001 per share.  As of the date of the filing of this Current Report on Form 8-K, the holders of the majority shares of common of PURA have exchanged their shares into a majority of the shares of the issued and outstanding shares of the Company's common stock.





	As a result of the Share Exchange Agreement and the other transactions contemplated thereunder, PURA is now a majority owned subsidiary of the Company.





	The above description of the Share Exchange Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Share Exchange Agreement, which is attached here to as Exhibit 2.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.





	Subscription Agreements





	On June 2, 2016, PURA entered into that certain subscriptions agreement

	(

	the "Subscription Agreement") with an accredited investor for the issuance of convertible promissory notes (the "Notes") in the aggregate principal amount of $400,000, which are convertible into shares of common stock of the Company at $0.75 per share.


	 


	 


	 







	- 2 -


























	Item 2.01 Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.






	The information set forth in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated herein by reference.






	As described in Item 1.01 above, effective July 18, 2016, the Company entered into a Share Exchange Agreement which resulted in PURA becoming our majority-owned subsidiary.







	PURA, a Delaware corporation, was formed in 2013.  The inspiration for the Company's creation was the Gulf of Mexico oil spill in 2010. This massive spill released over 200 million gallons of oil along the Gulf Coast, making it one of the worst oil disasters in history. The immediate impact on the environment and wildlife was devastating. PURA partnered with

	Advanced Innovative Recovery Technology, Inc. (AIRTech), a significant shareholder of PURA, to create a

	revolutionary and proprietary bio-based foam that was created to clean up the Gulf. The non-toxic foam called BeBetterFoam® is made from renewable resources


	instead


	of petroleum.





	PURA markets and sells a line of cleaning products based on the BeBetterFoam® platform for consumer kitchen and bathroom, with additional products for outdoor hobbies (fishing and boating, spas and pools), pet care, infant care and industrial use currently under development.  The Bath & Body line and household (including kitchen) sponges are Oleophilic which means, among other things, that it absorbs oil, grease and grime, removes impurities from skin (cleansing and applying/removing make- up), is latex-free.  PURA products are also non-toxic, contain Plant-Based/ renewable resources, have a carbon-negative footprint (removes more carbon than is created), contain no petroleum by-products, use no adhesives or glues, and are infused with soap that is 100% Natural, bio-degradable, sustainable, Vegan, gluten-free, contains botanicals and essential oils; SLS-, Sulfate, Paraben-, and BPA- Free.   The BeBetterFoam® is hydrophobic, which means it resists and does not support bacteria.  PURA belives tbat the BeBetterFoam® also is up to 40 times stronger than the leading kitchen sponge brand.





	BeBetterFoam® is a unique, proprietary polymer process technology that is protected by a trade secret, completely owned by AIRTech and exclusively licensed to PURA, and is incapable of being reverse engineered.





	PURA's  Management Team consists of:





	Chief Executive Officer – James (Jim) Kordenbrock





	Mr. Kordenbrock was a military officer for six years and Captain in the United States Army, serving as a Cobra attack helicopter aviator, leading organizations of hundreds both in the air and on the ground. Following his departure from the military, Mr. Kordenbrock applied this ethos of hard work, determination and focus to his career in marketing, advertising and senior management.


	 


	 


	 


	 




	- 3 -







	 



	 






	His first position with Leo Burnett quickly propelled him up the ranks when he was selected for the team that repositioned Miller Lite, leading to one of the firm's most impressive account wins. Over the years, Mr. Kordenbrock oversaw the launches of startups and ran strategy for Fortune 500 companies including: Volvo, BMW, Mazda, Marlboro, Miller Lite, and Xerox.





	In 2009, Mr. Kordenbrock's decision to diversify his career and expand his sales knowledge provoked him to join two of the most respected financial services companies in the nation, Northwestern Mutual and Mass Mutual. Here, he earned multiple selling honors including selection to the prestigious Million Dollar Round Table (MDRT).





	Today, Mr. Kordenbrock is again taking on a leadership role, paving the way to aid the planet and the lives of American consumers. As Chief Executive Officer of Pura Naturals, Mr. Kordenbrock is bringing new technology to the masses that is not only manufactured with eco-friendly materials, but also utilizes the BeBetterFoam® technology that was created in response to the 2010 Gulf oil spill.







	Mr. Kordenbrock is a strong believer in giving back to the community and has been involved with numerous volunteer organizations and boards such as the CURE Childhood Cancer Association, Birthright of Victor, and Victor Community Baseball and Softball. He received the Rochester's "Top 40 Under 40" Award for his civic and business achievements. As a passionate soccer referee, certified as a United States Soccer Federation (USSF) State-level (Grade 15) and a certified high school referee, he also formerly served on the board of the American Youth Soccer Organization. Mr. Kordenbrock received a full ROTC scholarship and graduated with honors from Niagara University with a Bachelor of Science degree in marketing.







	President and Chief Financial Officer – Robert (Bob) Doherty





	Mr. Doherty is a seasoned business and technology senior executive with expertise in manufacturing, operations and engineering. He has successfully led global businesses and has a proven track record of consistently exceeding revenue and profit objectives. Mr. Doherty is a proven expert in translating broad strategies into specific objectives/plans and successfully translating those objectives into action and quantifiable results. Mr. Doherty has two patents and 37 proprietary rights in his name.





	Recently Mr. Doherty led the ALM Tech Group from sales of $360,000 to $4.5 million in 2013. Projected sales for 2014 are $7.5 million. He created three unique divisions, and incorporated the assets of each to provide solutions for customers' requirements (Boeing, Lockheed and the Department of Defense).





	Mr. Doherty grew sales of ArmorStruxx, a $100 million manufacturer of comprehensive ballistic and blast protection solutions specializing in lightweight armor system design and integration, from $235,000 to $14.2 million within three months. Mr. Doherty researched, engineered and qualified a ballistic MRAP armor solution for Navistar Defense in less than 5 weeks, achieving a full production run rate in six weeks.


	 


	 


	 




	- 4 -











	 



	 





	At Cosmotronic, Mr. Doherty served as CEO and Board member for a two-facility, 110 employee, and $14+ million printed circuit board fabrication company. He successfully led and guided the company through the Chapter 11 process in five weeks. He was responsible for the restructuring of $42 million in legacy debt and transforming the business from monthly losses into a profitable company, increasing sales from $7.4 to $14.3 million in three years while decreasing the cost of operations and overhead.







	Mr. Robert Switzer, Corporate Secretary







	Mr. Switzer has 25 years of experience in business and executive management, with particular expertise and passion for start-ups. Through the years, Mr. Switzer has gained vast experience in a wide array of business matters for companies of all sizes.





	His expertise includes business start-up consulting, organizational controls, operational design, business development, intellectual property development and profit, sales and marketing development, public relations assistance, trade secret maximization, financial forecasting and modeling, asset management, reorganizations, expansions, mergers and acquisitions, financing, executive management coaching, business valuations, regulatory compliance, divestitures, law, litigation, contract writing and enforcement, commercial and secured transactions, and complex dispute resolution.





	As a start-up specialist, Mr. Switzer has taken businesses from very simple beginning concepts to millions of dollars in sales. As a reorganization specialist, Mr. Switzer has restructured debt and equity, reduced liabilities by $22,000,000, revitalized net revenue, and accomplished a total turn-around.  Typically, Mr. Switzer is able to quickly change management pathways from being stagnant or non-productive, to being profitable and providing investor returns. Mr. Switzer has doubled and tripled the value of intellectual property rights for various business organizations.





	Mr. Switzer will lead Earth Conscious Technology with the expansion of product lines beyond memory foam applications, taking advantage of the vast array of BeBetterFoam

	®

	formulas available through Advanced Innovative Recovery Technologies. This will allow Earth Conscious Technology to expand into sporting goods, construction materials, and other sales channels, where margins are particularly attractive. Mr. Switzer's plan will allow Earth Conscious Technology to reach aggressive sales goals over the next 24 months. Earth Conscious Technology will also enter into a number of licensing relationships that include royalties. Earth Conscious Technology holds a tremendous upside potential for long-term equity growth.





	Mr. Switzer's education includes a Bachelor of Science in Business Administration, with a Finance Major, from the University of Arizona. Mr. Switzer completed his Post-Graduate Juris Doctor degree from the University of San Diego, School of Law in 1989.  He is also a California Licensed Real Estate Broker.  He has been a youth football and lacrosse coach for 14 years.







	PURA's offices are located in Lake Forest, California.


	 


	 


	 


	 




	- 5 -









	 



	 

















	Item 3.02 Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities.






	The information set forth in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated herein by reference.







	Pursuant to the terms of the Share Exchange Agreement, the Company shall issue up to 6,267,000 shares of the Company's common stock in exchange for approximately 15,000,000 shares of common stock and preferred stock of PURA, and an additional approximately 470,000 as shares issuable upon exercise of outstanding options to purchase PURA's shares of common stock.





	Prior to the Closing Date, the Company entered into a Subscription Agreement with an accredited investor for the issuance of a Convertible Promissory Note.  The Note has an aggregate principal amount of $400,000 and matures one year from the date of issuance (the "Maturity Date") and has an interest rate of 8% per annum.  The holder may convert the Notes at any time up to the Maturity Date into shares of the Company's common stock, par value $0.001 per share, at a conversion price equal to $0.75 per share.  The Company may prepay the Notes prior to the Maturity Date and/or the date of conversion without penalty upon receiving the written consent of the holder.





	These securities were not registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), but qualified for exemption under Section 4(2) of the Securities Act. The securities were exempt from registration under Section 4(2) of the Securities Act because the issuance of such securities by the Company did not involve a "public offering," as defined in Section 4(2) of the Securities Act, due to the insubstantial number of persons involved in the transaction, size of the offering, manner of the offering and number of securities offered. The Company did not undertake an offering in which it sold a high number of securities to a high number of investors. In addition, these shareholders had the necessary investment intent as required by Section 4(2) of the Securities Act since they agreed to, and received, share certificates bearing a legend stating that such securities are restricted pursuant to Rule 144 of the Securities Act. This restriction ensures that these securities would not be immediately redistributed into the market and therefore not be part of a "public offering." Based on an analysis of the above factors, we have met the requirements to qualify for exemption under Section 4(2) of the Securities Act.


	 


	 


	 




	- 6 -

















	 



	 





	Item 5.01 Changes in Control of Registrant







	The information set forth in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated herein by reference.






	As more fully described in Item 1.01 above, the Company shall issue up to approximately 6,267,000 Shares of the Company's common stock to the PURA Shareholders in exchange for up to approximately 15,200,000 of the issued and outstanding shares of the capital stock of PURA, together with shares issuable upon exercise of options. As of the date of the filing of this Current Report on Form 8-K, the holders of the majority shares of common and preferred stock of PURA have exchanged approximately 15,200,000 shares of PURA common and preferred stock into 6,267,000 shares of the Company's common stock, which constitutes approximately 55% percent of the currently issued and outstanding shares of the Company's common stock.





	In connection with the Closing of the Share Exchange Agreement, and as explained more fully in Item 5.02 below, Mr. James Kordenbrock was appointed as Chief Executive Officer and as a member of the board of the directors (the "Board") and Mr. Gary Okizaki resigned as Chief Executive Officer, and Brian Yamauchi and Monroe Coleman resigned as officers of the Company and Monroe Coleman resigned as a director.  Further, Messrs. Okizaki and Yanauchi have submitted their notices to resign as directors following a brief transition period and the 10-day notice to shareholders of a change in control on Schedule 14f-1.  Following such period, and upon the effectiveness of the resignations of Messrs. Okizaki and Yamauchi, Mr. Mr. Robert Doherty and Mr. Robert Switzer will join the Board as directors.





	Further, effective on the Closing Date, Mr. Robert Doherty was appointed President and Chief Financial Officer.


	 


	 


	 



	- 7 -














	 



	 








	Item 5.02

	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.







	Resignation of Chief Executive Officer and Director






	Effective on the Closing Date, Mr. Gary Okizaki resigned as Chief Executive Officer and member of the Board, and Brian Yamauchi and Monroe Coleman resigned as officers and directors of the Company.  None of such officer's and director's  resignations are the result of a disagreement with the Company on any matter relating to the Company's operations, policies or practices.





	Appointment of Chief Executive Officer and Directors





	Effective on the Closing Date, Mr. James Kordenbrock was appointed as Chief Executive Officer and as a member of the Board, Mr. Robert Doherty was appointed President and Chief Financial Officer and as a member of the board, Mr. Robert Switzer was appointed Secretary and as a member of the board.  A discussion of the new officers' relevant business experience is set forth in Item 2.01 above, and incorporated by reference herein.





	Family Relationships





	Neither Mr. Kordenbrock, Mr. Doherty nor Mr. Switzer have a family relationship with any of the current officers or directors of the Company.





	Related Party Transactions





	There are no related party transactions reportable under Item 5.02 of Form 8-K and Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K.


	 


	 


	 


	 







	- 8 -









	 



	 










	Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.










	(a)




	Financial Statements of Business Acquired.










	This Current Report on Form 8-K will be supplemented by amendment to provide the required financial statements not later than 71 days after the date that this Current Report on Form 8-K was required to be filed.










	(b)




	Pro Forma Financial Information.










	This Current Report on Form 8-K will be supplemented by amendment to provide the required pro forma financial information not later than 71 days after the date that this Current Report on Form 8-K was required to be filed.







	(d) Exhibits.









	Exhibit No.



	 



	Description





	 


	 


	 





	2.1



	 



	Form of Share Exchange Agreement, effective as of July 18, 2016, by and among Yummy Flies, Inc., PURA Naturals, Inc. and shareholders of PURA Naturals, Inc.*










	* Filed herewith


	 


	 


	 



	- 9 -




















	Signatures










	Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


	 


	 








	 


	 




	 


	YUMMY FLIES, INC.


	 






	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 






	 


	July 25, 2016


	 




	 




	 


	By:

	/s/ James Kordenbrock







	 


	 


	 James Kordenbrock



	Chief Executive Officer








	 


	 


	 



	 



	 


	 


	 


	 





	- 10 -










	Exhibit 2.1


	 


	 


	 


	 


















	SHARE EXCHANGE AGREEMENT







	by and among






	YUMMY FLIES, INC.




	PURA NATURALS, INC.



	and












	THE SHAREHOLDERS OF



	PURA NATURALS, INC.



	NAMED HEREIN







	Dated as of July 15, 2016












	 



	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 1







	 



	 








	SHARE EXCHANGE AGREEMENT








	This SHARE EXCHANGE AGREEMENT (this "


	Agreement


	"), dated as of July 15, 2016, is by and among YUMMY FLIES, INC., a Colorado corporation ("


	YMMF


	"),

	 

	PURA NATURALS, INC.

	, a Delaware corporation

	("


	PURA


	"), and the individuals identified on


	Annex A


	hereto.  Each of the parties to this Agreement is individually referred to herein as a "


	Party


	" and collectively, as the "


	Parties


	."  Capitalized terms used herein that are not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed to them in


	Annex B


	hereto.







	BACKGROUND








	A


	            


	YMMF is a publicly traded corporation quoted on the OTC Markets (the "OTC").




	B.


	            


	PURA has 15,000,000 shares of common stock (the "


	PURA Stock


	"), issued and outstanding, approximately 90% of which are held by the shareholders identified on Annex A (together referred to herein as the "


	Shareholders


	" and each a "


	Shareholder


	").  Each Shareholder is the record and beneficial owner of the number of shares of PURA Stock, or the right to receive such shares, set forth opposite such Shareholder's name on


	Annex A


	hereto.  PURA has also granted to the rights holders identified on Schedule 3.3 in connection with the issuance of options (each, a "


	PURA Option


	") the right to receive PURA Stock (together referred to herein as the "


	Stakeholders


	" and each a "


	Stakeholder


	").




	C.


	            


	Each Shareholder has agreed to transfer all of his, her or its (hereinafter "


	its


	") shares of PURA Stock, or the right to receive such stock, in exchange for newly issued shares of the Common Stock, $0.001 par value, of YMMF (the "


	YMMF Stock


	").  Each of such Stakeholders has agreed herein to accept shares of YMMF Stock (as defined below) in lieu of PURA Stock upon exercise or conversion of such Stakeholder's PURA Options.




	D.


	            


	The number of shares of YMMF Stock to be received by each Shareholder and Stakeholder is listed opposite each such Stakeholder's name on


	Annex A


	.  The aggregate number of shares of YMMF Stock that is reflected on


	Annex A


	is referred to herein as the "


	Shares


	." Approximately 470,000 shares of YMMF Stock will be reserved for issuance upon conversion of the PURA Options, as set forth on Annex A.  In the aggregate, the shares of YMMF Stock issuable to Shareholders will be approximately seventy-five percent (75%) of the issued and outstanding capital stock of YMMF as of and immediately after the Closing.









	E.


	            


	The Board of Directors of each of YMMF and PURA has determined that it is desirable to effect this plan of reorganization and share exchange.








	AGREEMENT







	NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the respective representations, warranties, covenants and agreements set forth herein, and intending to be legally bound hereby, the Parties agree as follows:







	ARTICLE I



	Exchange of Shares









	1.1.


	            


	Exchange by the Shareholders.  At the Closing, each Shareholder shall sell, transfer, convey, assign and deliver to YMMF its PURA Stock free and clear of all Liens in exchange for the YMMF Stock listed on


	Annex A


	opposite such Shareholder's name.



	 


	 



	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 2














	1.2.


	            



	Exchange by the Stakeholders.


	     

	Following the Closing, each Stakeholder agrees that its PURA Option shall be convertible into, or exercisable for, as the case may be, shares of YMMF Stock set forth on Schedule 3.3 opposite such Stakeholder's name, in lieu of PURA Stock.




	1.3.


	            


	Closing.  The closing (the "


	Closing


	") of the transactions contemplated hereby (the "


	Transactions


	") shall take place at the offices of Kline Law Group, PC in Irvine, CA commencing at 9:00 a.m. local time on the second business day following the satisfaction or waiver of all conditions to the obligations of the Parties to consummate the Transactions (other than conditions with respect to actions that the respective parties will take at Closing) or such other date and time as the Parties may mutually determine (the "


	Closing Date


	").









	1.4


	            


	Legal Fees.  The parties acknowledge and agree that Kline Law Group, PC has acted as counsel to YYMF in connection herewith, and upon consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby shall act as counsel to the combined entity.  The parties further acknowledge and agree that PURA has, as partial consideration hereof, pre-paid legal fees incurred by YMMF in the amount of $25,000.  YMMF and PURA have executed and delivered a conflict waiver prior to the date hereof.








	ARTICLE II



	Representations and Warranties of the Shareholders and Stakeholders








	Each of the Shareholders and Stakeholders hereby severally (and not jointly) represents and warrants to YMMF with respect to itself, as follows.



	2.1.


	            


	Good Title.  The Shareholder is the record and beneficial owner, and has good title to its PURA Stock, with the right and authority to sell and deliver such PURA Stock.  Upon delivery of any certificate or certificates duly assigned, representing the same as herein contemplated and/or upon registering of YMMF as the new owner of such PURA Stock in the share register of PURA, YMMF will receive good title to such PURA Stock, free and clear of all Liens.  The Stakeholder is the record and beneficial owner of its PURA Option, and has good title to such PURA Option with the sole right and authority to convert and/or exercise such PURA Option.




	2.2.


	            


	Organization.  Each Shareholder or Stakeholder that is an entity is duly organized and validly existing in its jurisdiction of organization.




	2.3.


	            


	Power and Authority.  The Shareholder or Stakeholder has the legal power, capacity and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and each Transaction Document to be delivered by it hereunder and to perform its obligations hereunder and thereunder, and to consummate the Transactions.  All acts required to be taken by the Shareholder or Stakeholder to enter into this Agreement, to deliver each Transaction Document to which it is a party and to carry out the Transactions have been properly taken.  This Agreement constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Shareholder or Stakeholder, enforceable against the Shareholder or Stakeholder in accordance with the terms hereof, except as such enforcement is limited by general equitable principles, or by bankruptcy, insolvency and other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 3















	2.4.


	            


	No Conflicts.  The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Shareholder or Stakeholder and the performance by the Shareholder or Stakeholder of its obligations hereunder in accordance with the terms hereof: (a) will not require the consent of any third party or Governmental Entity under any Laws; (b) will not violate any Laws applicable to the Shareholder or Stakeholder; and (c) will not violate or breach any contractual obligation to which the Shareholder or Stakeholder is a party.




	2.5.


	            


	Litigation.  There is no pending proceeding against the Shareholder or Stakeholder that involves the Shares or PURA Options or that challenges, or may have the effect of preventing, delaying or making illegal, or otherwise interfering with, any of the Transactions and, to the knowledge of the Shareholder or Stakeholder, no such proceeding has been threatened, and no event or circumstance exists that is reasonably likely to give rise to or serve as a basis for the commencement of any such proceeding.




	2.6.


	            


	No Finder's Fee.  The Shareholder or Stakeholder has not created any obligation for any finder's, investment banker's or broker's fee in connection with the Transactions.




	2.7.


	            


	Purchase Entirely for Own Account.  The YMMF Stock proposed to be acquired by the Shareholder or Stakeholder hereunder will be acquired for investment for its own account, and not with a view to the resale or distribution of any part thereof, and the Shareholder or Stakeholder has no present intention of selling or otherwise distributing the YMMF Stock, except in compliance with applicable securities laws.




	2.8.


	            


	Available Information.  The Shareholder or Stakeholder has such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters that it is capable of evaluating the merits and risks of investment in YMMF.




	2.9.


	            


	Non-Registration.  The Shareholder or Stakeholder understands that the YMMF Stock has not been registered under the Securities Act and, if issued in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, will be issued by reason of a specific exemption from the registration provisions of the Securities Act which depends upon, among other things, the bona fide nature of the investment intent and the accuracy of the Shareholder's or Stakeholder's representations as expressed herein.  The non-registration shall have no prejudice with respect to any rights, interests, benefits and entitlements attached to the YMMF Stock in accordance with YMMF's charter documents or the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation.




	2.10.


	            


	Restricted Securities.  The Shareholder or Stakeholder understands that the Shares are characterized as "restricted securities" under the Securities Act inasmuch as this Agreement contemplates that, if acquired by the Shareholder or Stakeholder pursuant hereto, the Shares would be acquired in a transaction not involving a public offering. The issuance of the Shares hereunder have not been registered under the Securities Act or the securities laws of any state of the U.S. and that the issuance of the YMMF Stock is being effected in reliance upon an exemption from registration afforded under Section 4(2) of the Securities Act for transactions by an issuer not involving a public offering. The Shareholder further acknowledges that if the Shares are issued to the Shareholder or Stakeholder in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement and the Intruments, such Shares may not be resold without registration under the Securities Act or the existence of an exemption therefrom.  The Shareholder or Stakeholder represents that it is familiar with Rule 144 promulgated under the Securities Act, as presently in effect, and understands the resale limitations imposed thereby and by the Securities Act.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 4


















	2.11.


	            


	Accredited Investor.  The Shareholder or Stakeholder is an "Accredited Investor" within the meaning of Rule 501 under the Securities Act and the Shareholder was not organized for the specific purpose of acquiring the Shares.




	2.12.


	            


	Legends.   The Shareholder or Stakeholder hereby agrees with YMMF that the YMMF Stock will bear the following legend or one that is substantially similar to the following legend:







	THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS CERTIFICATE HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "SECURITIES ACT"), OR ANY STATE SECURITIES LAWS AND NEITHER SUCH SECURITIES NOR ANY INTEREST THEREIN MAY BE OFFERED, SOLD, PLEDGED, ASSIGNED OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRED EXCEPT (1) PURSUANT TO AN EFFECTIVE REGISTRATION STATEMENT UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT AND APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS OR (2) PURSUANT TO AN AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT AND APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS, IN WHICH CASE THE HOLDER MUST, PRIOR TO SUCH TRANSFER, FURNISH TO THE COMPANY AN OPINION OF COUNSEL, WHICH COUNSEL AND OPINION ARE REASONABLY SATISFACTORY TO THE COMPANY, THAT SUCH SECURITIES MAY BE OFFERED, SOLD, PLEDGED, ASSIGNED OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRED IN THE MANNER CONTEMPLATED PURSUANT TO AN AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT AND APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS.







	2.13.


	            


	Additional Legend; Consent. Additionally, the YMMF Stock will bear any legend required by the "blue sky" laws of any state to the extent such laws are applicable to the securities represented by the certificate so legended. The Shareholder or Stakeholder consents to YMMF making a notation on its records or giving instructions to any transfer agent of YMMF Stock in order to implement the restrictions on transfer of the Shares.








	ARTICLE III



	Representations and Warranties of PURA








	PURA represents and warrants as follows to YMMF.


	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 5

















	3.1.


	            


	Organization, Standing and Power.  PURA and each of its subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is organized and has the corporate power and authority and possesses all governmental franchises, licenses, permits, authorizations and approvals necessary to enable it to own, lease or otherwise hold its properties and assets and to conduct its businesses as presently conducted, other than such franchises, licenses, permits, authorizations and approvals the lack of which, individually or in the aggregate, has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on PURA, a material adverse effect on the ability of PURA to perform its obligations under this Agreement or on the ability of PURA to consummate the Transactions (a "PURA


	Material Adverse Effect


	").  PURA and each of its subsidiaries is duly qualified to do business in each jurisdiction where the nature of its business or its ownership or leasing of its properties make such qualification necessary except where the failure to so qualify would not reasonably be expected to have a PURA Material Adverse Effect.  PURA has delivered to YMMF true and complete copies of the PURA Charter, the PURA Bylaws, and the comparable charter, organizational documents and other constituent PURA Options of each of its subsidiaries, in each case as amended through the date of this Agreement.




	3.2.


	            


	Subsidiaries; Equity Interests.  All the outstanding shares of capital stock or equity investments of each subsidiary have been validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable and are as of the date of this Agreement owned by PURA, by another subsidiary of PURA or by PURA and another subsidiary of PURA, free and clear of all Liens.  Except for its interests in its subsidiaries, PURA does not as of the date of this Agreement own, directly or indirectly, any capital stock, membership interest, partnership interest, joint venture interest or other equity interest in any person.




	3.3.


	            


	Capital Structure.  The authorized capital stock of PURA consists of 100,000,000 shares of common stock and 25,000,000 shares of preferred stock.  As of the date hereof, 15,000,000 shares of common stock, and no shares of Preferred Stock are issued and outstanding.  Except as set forth on Annex A attached hereto, no shares of capital stock or other voting securities of PURA are issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding.  PURA is the sole record and beneficial owner of all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each of its subsidiaries.  All outstanding shares of the capital stock of PURA and each of its subsidiaries are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and not subject to or issued in violation of any purchase option, call option, right of first refusapreemptive right, subscription right or any similar right under any provision of the law of Delaware, the PURA Charter, the PURA Bylaws or any Contract to which PURA is a party or otherwise bound.  Except as set forth on Annex A, there are not any bonds, debentures, notes or other indebtedness of PURA or any of its subsidiaries having the right to vote (or convertible into, or exchangeable for, securities having the right to vote) on any matters on which holders of PURA's capital stock or the capital stock of any of its subsidiaries may vote ("Voting PURA Debt").  Except as set forth on Annex A, as of the date of this Agreement, there are not any options, warrants, rights, convertible or exchangeable securities, "phantom" stock rights, stock appreciation rights, stock-based performance units, commitments, Contracts, arrangements or undertakings of any kind to which PURA or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which any of them is bound (a) obligating PURA or any of its subsidiaries to issue, deliver or sell, or cause to be issued, delivered or sold, additional shares of capital stock or other equity interests in, or any security convertible or exercisable for or exchangeable into any capital stock of or other equity interest in, PURA or any of its subsidiaries or any Voting PURA Debt, (b) obligating PURA or any of its subsidiaries to issue, grant, extend or enter into any such option, warrant, call, right, security, commitment, Contract, arrangement or undertaking or (c) that give any person the right to receive any economic benefit or right similar to or derived from the economic benefits and rights occurring to holders of the capital stock of PURA or of any of its subsidiaries.  As of the date of this Agreement, there are not any outstanding contractual obligations of PURA to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any shares of capital stock of PURA.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 6















	3..4


	            


	Authority; Execution and Delivery; Enforceability.  PURA has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and to consummate the Transactions.  The execution and delivery by PURA of this Agreement and the consummation by PURA of the Transactions have been duly authorized and approved by the Board of Directors of PURA and no other corporate proceedings on the part of PURA are necessary to authorize this Agreement and the Transactions.  When executed and delivered, this Agreement will be enforceable against PURA in accordance with its terms. , except as such enforcement is limited by general equitable principles, or by bankruptcy, insolvency and other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally.




	3.5.


	            


	No Conflicts; Consents.  The execution and delivery by PURA of this Agreement does not, and the consummation of the Transactions and compliance with the terms hereof will not, conflict with, or result in any violation of or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of termination, cancellation or acceleration of any obligation or to loss of a material benefit under, or result in the creation of any Lien upon any of the properties or assets of PURA or any of its subsidiaries under, any provision of (i) the PURA Charter, the PURA Bylaws or the comparable charter or organizational documents of any of its subsidiaries, (ii) any material Contract to which PURA or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which any of their respective properties or assets is bound or (iii) subject to the filings and other matters referred to in Section 3.5(b), any material judgment, order or decree or material Law applicable to PURA or any of its subsidiaries or their respective properties or assets, other than, in the case of clauses (ii) and (iii) above, any such items that, individually or in the aggregate, have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a PURA Material Adverse Effect.




	3.6.


	            


	Except for any required filings under applicable "Blue Sky" or state securities commissions, no Consent of, or registration, declaration or filing with, or permit from, any Governmental Entity is required to be obtained or made by or with respect to PURA or any of its subsidiaries in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement or the consummation of the Transactions.




	3.7.


	            


	Taxes.  Each of PURA and each of its subsidiaries has timely filed, or has caused to be timely filed on its behalf, all Tax Returns required to be filed by it, and all such Tax Returns are true, complete and accurate, except to the extent any failure to timely file or any inaccuracies in any filed Tax Returns, individually or in the aggregate, have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a PURA Material Adverse Effect.  All Taxes shown to be due on such Tax Returns, or otherwise owed, have been timely paid, except to the extent that any failure to timely pay or pay, individually or in the aggregate, has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a PURA Material Adverse Effect.  There are no unpaid taxes in any material amount claimed to be due by the taxing authority of any jurisdiction, and the officers of PURA know of no basis for any such claim.




	3.8.


	            


	The PURA Financial Statements reflect an adequate reserve for all Taxes payable by PURA and its subsidiaries (in addition to any reserve for deferred Taxes to reflect timing differences between book and Tax items) for all Taxable periods and portions thereof through the date of such financial statements.  To the knowledge of PURA no deficiency with respect to any Taxes has been proposed, asserted or assessed against PURA or any of its subsidiaries, and no requests for waivers of the time to assess any such Taxes are pending, except to the extent any such deficiency or request for waiver, individually or in the aggregate, has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a PURA Material Adverse Effect.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 7















	3.9.


	            


	Benefit Plans.  PURA does not have or maintain any collective bargaining agreement or any bonus, pension, profit sharing, deferred compensation, incentive compensation, stock ownership, stock purchase, stock option, phantom stock, retirement, vacation, severance, disability, death benefit, hospitalization, medical or other plan, arrangement or understanding (whether or not legally binding) providing benefits to any current or former employee, officer or director of PURA or any of its subsidiaries (collectively, "


	PURA Benefit Plans


	").  As of the date of this Agreement there are not any severance or termination agreements or arrangements between PURA or any of its subsidiaries and any current or former employee, officer or director of PURA or any of its subsidiaries, nor does PURA or any of its subsidiaries have any general severance plan or policy.




	3.10.


	            


	Litigation. There is no Action against or affecting PURA or any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective properties which (a) adversely affects or challenges the legality, validity or enforceability of any of this Agreement or the Shares or (b) could, if there were an unfavorable decision, individually or in the aggregate, have or reasonably be expected to result in a PURA Material Adverse Effect.  Neither PURA nor any of its subsidiaries, nor to the knowledge of any director or officer thereof (in his or her capacity as such), is or has been the subject of any Action involving a claim or violation of or liability under federal or state securities laws or a claim of breach of fiduciary duty.




	3.11.


	            


	Compliance with Applicable Laws.  PURA and each of its subsidiaries have conducted their business and operations in compliance with all applicable Laws, including those relating to occupational health and safety and the environment, except for instances of noncompliance that, individually and in the aggregate, have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a PURA Material Adverse Effect.  PURA has not received any written communication during the past two years from a Governmental Entity that alleges that PURA is not in compliance in any material respect with any applicable Law.  This Section 3.9 does not relate to matters with respect to Taxes, which are the subject of Section 3.6.




	3.12.


	            


	Brokers.  Except as set forth in the PURA Disclosure Letter, no broker, investment banker, financial advisor or other person is entitled to any broker's, finder's, financial advisor's or other similar fee or commission in connection with the Transactions based upon arrangements made by or on behalf of PURA or any of its subsidiaries.




	3.13.


	            


	Contracts.  There are no Contracts that are material to the business, properties, assets, condition (financial or otherwise), results of operations or prospects of PURA and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.  Neither PURA nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of or in default under (nor does there exist any condition which upon the passage of time or the giving of notice would cause such a violation of or default under) any Contract to which it is a party or by which it or any of its properties or assets is bound, except for violations or defaults that would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a PURA Material Adverse Effect.




	3.14.


	            


	Title to Properties.  Neither PURA nor any of its subsidiaries own any real property.  PURA and each of its subsidiaries has sufficient title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all of its properties and assets used in the conduct of its businesses, except to the extent the failure of having such sufficient title or valid leasehold interest, would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect..  All such assets and properties, other than assets and properties in which PURA or any of its subsidiaries has leasehold interests, are free and clear of all Liens other than those set forth in the PURA Disclosure Letter and except for Liens that, in the aggregate, do not and will not materially interfere with the ability of PURA and its subsidiaries to conduct business as currently conducted.



	 


	 



	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 8














	3.15.


	            


	Intellectual Property.  PURA and each of its subsidiaries own, or are validly licensed or otherwise have the right to use, all Intellectual Property Rights which are material to the conduct of the business of PURA and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.  There are no claims pending or, to the knowledge of PURA, threatened that PURA or any of its subsidiaries is infringing or otherwise adversely affecting the rights of any person with regard to any Intellectual Property Right.  To the knowledge of PURA, no person is infringing the rights of PURA or any of its subsidiaries with respect to any Intellectual Property Right.




	3.16.


	            


	Financial Statements.  PURA has delivered to YMMF its unaudited consolidated financial statements for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 (the "


	PURA Financial Statements


	").  The PURA Financial Statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis throughout the period indicated.  The PURA Financial Statements fairly present in all material respects the financial condition and operating results of PURA, as of the dates, and for the periods, indicated therein.  PURA does not have any material liabilities or obligations, contingent or otherwise, other than (a) liabilities incurred in the ordinary course of business subsequent to December 31, 2016, and (b) obligations under contracts and commitments incurred in the ordinary course of business and not required under GAAP to be reflected in the PURA Financial Statements, which, in both cases, individually and in the aggregate, would not be reasonably expected to result in a PURA Material Adverse Effect.




	3.17.


	            


	Transactions with Affiliates and Employees.  None of the officers or directors of PURA and, to the knowledge of PURA, none of the employees of PURA is presently a party to any transaction with PURA or any of its subsidiaries (other than for services as employees, officers and directors), including any Contract or other arrangement providing for the furnishing of services to or by, providing for rental of real or personal property to or from, or otherwise requiring payments to or from any officer, director or such employee or, to the knowledge of PURA, any entity in which any officer, director, or any such employee has a substantial interest or is an officer, director, trustee or partner.




	3.18.


	            


	Solvency.  Based on the financial condition of PURA as of the Closing Date (and assuming that the Closing shall have occurred), (a) PURA's fair saleable value of its assets exceeds the amount that will be required to be paid on or in respect of PURA's existing debts and other liabilities (including known contingent liabilities) as they mature, (b) PURA's assets do not constitute unreasonably small capital to carry on its business for the current fiscal year as now conducted and as proposed to be conducted including its capital needs taking into account the particular capital requirements of the business conducted by PURA, and projected capital requirements and capital availability thereof, and (c) the current cash flow of PURA, together with the proceeds PURA would receive, were it to liquidate all of its assets, after taking into account all anticipated uses of the cash, would be sufficient to pay all amounts on or in respect of its debt when such amounts are required to be paid.  PURA does not intend to incur debts beyond its ability to pay such debts as they mature (taking into account the timing and amounts of cash to be payable on or in respect of its debt).




	3.19.


	            


	Investment Company.  PURA is not, and is not an affiliate of, and immediately following the Closing will not have become, an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 9















	3.20.


	            


	Foreign Corrupt Practices.  Neither PURA, nor any of its subsidiaries, nor, to PURA's knowledge, any director, officer, agent, employee or other person acting on behalf of PURA or any of its subsidiaries has, in the course of its actions for, or on behalf of, PURA (a) used any corporate funds for any unlawful contribution, gift, entertainment or other unlawful expenses relating to political activity; (b) made any direct or indirect unlawful payment to any foreign or domestic government official or employee from corporate funds; ; or (d) made any unlawful bribe, rebate, payoff, influence payment, kickback or other unlawful payment to any foreign or domestic government official or employee.




	3.21.


	            


	Absence of Certain Changes or Events.  From December 31, 2015 to the date of this Agreement, PURA has conducted its business only in the ordinary course, and during such period there has not been:









	(a)


	            


	any change in the assets, liabilities, financial condition or operating results of PURA or any of its subsidiaries, except changes in the ordinary course of business that have not caused, in the aggregate, a PURA Material Adverse Effect;




	(b)


	            


	any damage, destruction or loss, whether or not covered by insurance, that would have a PURA Material Adverse Effect;




	(c)


	            


	any waiver or compromise by PURA or any of its subsidiaries of a valuable right or of a material debt owed to it;




	(d)


	            


	any satisfaction or discharge of any lien, claim, or encumbrance or payment of any obligation by PURA or any of its subsidiaries, except in the ordinary course of business and the satisfaction or discharge of which would not have a PURA Material Adverse Effect;




	(e)


	            


	any material change to a material Contract by which PURA or any of its subsidiaries or any of its respective assets is bound or subject;




	(f)


	            


	any mortgage, pledge, transfer of a security interest in, or lien, created by PURA or any of its subsidiaries, with respect to any of its material properties or assets, except liens for taxes not yet due or payable and liens that arise in the ordinary course of business and do not materially impair PURA's or its subsidiaries' ownership or use of such property or assets;




	(g)


	            


	any loans or guarantees made by PURA or any of its subsidiaries to or for the benefit of its employees, officers or directors, or any members of their immediate families, other than travel advances and other advances made in the ordinary course of its business;




	(h)


	            


	any alteration of PURA's method of accounting or the identity of its auditors;




	(i)


	            


	any declaration or payment of dividend or distribution of cash or other property to the Shareholders or any purchase, redemption or agreements to purchase or redeem any PURA Stock;




	(j)


	            


	any issuance of equity securities to any officer, director or affiliate, except pursuant to existing PURA stock option plans; or



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 10















	(k)


	            


	any arrangement or commitment by PURA or any of its subsidiaries to do any of the things described in this Section 3.19.









	3.22.


	            


	Disclosure.  All disclosure provided to YMMF regarding PURA, its business and the Transactions, furnished by or on behalf of PURA (including PURA's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement) is true and correct and does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.




	3.23.


	            


	No Undisclosed Events, Liabilities, Developments or Circumstances.  No event, liability, development or circumstance has occurred or exists, to the knowledge of PURA, or is contemplated to occur with respect to PURA or any of its subsidiaries, or their respective businesses, properties, prospects, operations or financial condition, that would be required to be disclosed by PURA under applicable securities laws on a registration statement on Form S-1 filed with the SEC relating to an issuance and sale by PURA of its PURA Stock and which has not been publicly announced.




	3.25.


	            


	No Additional Agreements.  PURA does not have any agreement or understanding with the Shareholders with respect to the Transactions other than as specified in this Agreement.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 11











	ARTICLE IV



	Representations and Warranties of YMMF








	YMMF represents and warrants as follows to the Shareholders and PURA.








	4.1.


	            


	Organization, Standing and Power.  YMMF is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Wyoming and has full corporate power and authority and possesses all governmental franchises, licenses, permits, authorizations and approvals necessary to enable it to own, lease or otherwise hold its properties and assets and to conduct its businesses as presently conducted, other than such franchises, licenses, permits, authorizations and approvals the lack of which, individually or in the aggregate, has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on YMMF, a material adverse effect on the ability of YMMF to perform its obligations under this Agreement or on the ability of YMMF to consummate the Transactions (a "YMMF


	Material Adverse Effect


	").  YMMF is duly qualified to do business in each jurisdiction where the nature of its business or its ownership or leasing of its properties makes such qualification necessary and where the failure to so qualify would reasonably be expected to have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.  YMMF has delivered to PURA true and complete copies of the YMMF Charter and the YMMF Bylaws, as amended through date of this Agreement..




	4.2.


	            


	Subsidiaries; Equity Interests.  YMMF does not own, directly or indirectly, any capital stock, membership interest, partnership interest, joint venture interest or other equity interest in any person.




	4.3.


	            


	Capital Structure.  The authorized capital stock of YMMF consists of 100,000,000 shares of common stock, $.001 par value and no shares of Preferred Stock.  As of the date hereof approximately 10,278,000 shares of YMMF's common stock and no shares of preferred stock are issued and outstanding.  At the Closing, 8,289,000 shares of Common Stock will be cancelled by the holder thereof.  Except as set forth on Annex A, no shares of capital stock or other voting securities of YMMF are issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding.  All outstanding shares of the capital stock of YMMF are, and all such shares that may be issued prior to the date hereof will be when issued, duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and not subject to or issued in violation of any purchase option, call option, right of first refusal, preemptive right, subscription right or any similar right under any provision of Wyoming law, the YMMF Charter, the YMMF Bylaws or any Contract to which YMMF is a party or otherwise bound.  There are not any bonds, debentures, notes or other indebtedness of YMMF having the right to vote (or convertible into, or exchangeable for, securities having the right to vote) on any matters on which holders of YMMF's common stock may vote ("


	Voting YMMF Debt


	").  As of the date of this Agreement, there are not any options, warrants, rights, convertible or exchangeable securities, "phantom" stock rights, stock appreciation rights, stock-based performance units, commitments, Contracts, arrangements or undertakings of any kind to which YMMF is a party or by which it is bound (a) obligating YMMF to issue, deliver or sell, or cause to be issued, delivered or sold, additional shares of capital stock or other equity interests in, or any security convertible or exercisable for or exchangeable into any capital stock of or other equity interest in, YMMF or any Voting YMMF Debt, (b) obligating YMMF to issue, grant, extend or enter into any such option, warrant, call, right, security, commitment, Contract, arrangement or undertaking or (c) that give any person the right to receive any economic benefit or right similar to or derived from the economic benefits and rights occurring to holders of the capital stock of YMMF.  As of the date of this Agreement, there are not any outstanding contractual obligations of YMMF to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any shares of capital stock of YMMF.   The stockholder list provided to PURA is a current stockholder and such list accurately reflects all of the issued and outstanding shares of the YMMF's common stock.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 12















	4.4.


	            


	Authority; Execution and Delivery; Enforceability.  The execution and delivery by YMMF of this Agreement and the consummation by YMMF of the Transactions have been duly authorized and approved by the Board of Directors of YMMF and the holders of a majority of its capital stock and no other corporate proceedings on the part of YMMF are necessary to authorize this Agreement and the Transactions.  This Agreement constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of YMMF, enforceable against YMMF in accordance with the terms hereof.




	4.5.


	            


	No Conflicts; Consents.  The execution and delivery by YMMF of this Agreement does not, and the consummation of Transactions and compliance with the terms hereof will not, contravene, conflict with or result in any violation of or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of termination, cancellation or acceleration of any obligation or to loss of a material benefit under, or to increased, additional, accelerated or guaranteed rights or entitlements of any person under, or result in the creation of any Lien upon any of the properties or assets of YMMF under, any provision of (i) the YMMF Charter or YMMF Bylaws, (ii) any material Contract to which YMMF is a party or by which any of its properties or assets is bound or (iii) subject to the filings and other matters referred to in Section 4.6(b), any material Order or material Law applicable to YMMF or its properties or assets, other than, in the case of clauses (ii) and (iii) above, any such items that, individually or in the aggregate, have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.




	4.6.


	            


	No Consent of, or registration, declaration or filing with, or permit from, any Governmental Entity is required to be obtained or made by or with respect to YMMF in connection with the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement or the consummation of the Transactions, other than filings under state "blue sky" laws, as may be required in connection with this Agreement and the Transactions.




	4.7.


	            


	Taxes.  YMMF has timely filed, or has caused to be timely filed on its behalf, all Tax Returns required to be filed by it, and all such Tax Returns are true, complete and accurate, except to the extent any failure to file, any delinquency in filing or any inaccuracies in any filed Tax Returns, individually or in the aggregate, have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.  All Taxes shown to be due on such Tax Returns, or otherwise owed, have been timely paid, except to the extent that any failure to pay, individually or in the aggregate, has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.




	4.8.


	            


	The YMMF Financial Statements reflect an adequate reserve for all Taxes payable by YMMF (in addition to any reserve for deferred Taxes to reflect timing differences between book and Tax items) for all Taxable periods and portions thereof through the date of such financial statements.  No deficiency with respect to any Taxes has been proposed, asserted or assessed against YMMF, and no requests for waivers of the time to assess any such Taxes are pending, except to the extent any such deficiency or request for waiver, individually or in the aggregate, has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.




	4.9.


	            


	There are no Liens for Taxes (other than for current Taxes not yet due and payable) on the assets of YMMF.  YMMF is not bound by any agreement with respect to Taxes.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 13















	4.10.


	            


	Benefit Plans.  YMMF does not, and since its inception never has, maintained or contributed to any bonus, pension, profit sharing, deferred compensation, incentive compensation, stock ownership, stock purchase, stock option, phantom stock, retirement, vacation, severance, disability, death benefit, hospitalization, medical or other plan, arrangement or understanding (whether or not legally binding) providing benefits to any current or former employee, officer or director of YMMF.  As of the date of this Agreement, there are not any employment, consulting, indemnification, severance or termination agreements or arrangements between YMMF and any current or former employee, officer or director of YMMF, nor does YMMF have any general severance plan or policy.




	4.11.


	            


	Litigation.  There is no Action against or affecting YMMF or any subsidiary or any of their respective properties which (a) adversely affects or challenges the legality, validity or enforceability of either of this Agreement or the Shares or (b) could, if there were an unfavorable decision, individually or in the aggregate, have or reasonably be expected to result in a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.  Neither YMMF nor any subsidiary, nor any director or officer thereof (in his or her capacity as such), is or has been the subject of any Action involving a claim or violation of or liability under federal or state securities laws or a claim of breach of fiduciary duty.




	4.12.


	            


	Compliance with Applicable Laws.  YMMF is in compliance with all applicable Laws, including those relating to occupational health and safety, the environment, export controls, trade sanctions and embargoes, except for instances of noncompliance that, individually and in the aggregate, have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.  YMMF has not received any written communication during the past two years from a Governmental Entity that alleges that YMMF is not in compliance in any material respect with any applicable Law.  This Section 4.9 does not relate to matters with respect to Taxes, which are the subject of Section 4.7.




	4.13.


	            


	Contracts.  There are no Contracts that are material to the business, properties, assets, condition (financial or otherwise), results of operations or prospects of YMMF taken as a whole.  YMMF is not in violation of or in default under (nor does there exist any condition which upon the passage of time or the giving of notice would cause such a violation of or default under) any Contract to which it is a party or by which it or any of its properties or assets is bound, except for violations or defaults that would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to result in a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.




	4.14.


	            


	Title to Properties.  YMMF has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all of its properties and assets used in the conduct of its businesses.  All such assets and properties, other than assets and properties in which YMMF has leasehold interests, are free and clear of all Liens, except for Liens that, in the aggregate, do not and will not materially interfere with the ability of YMMF to conduct business as currently conducted.  YMMF has complied in all material respects with the terms of all material leases to which it is a party and under which it is in occupancy, and all such leases are in full force and effect.  YMMF enjoys peaceful and undisturbed possession under all such material leases.




	4.14.


	            


	Intellectual Property.  YMMF does not own, nor is validly licensed nor otherwise has the right to use, any Intellectual Property Rights.  No claims are pending or, to the knowledge of YMMF, threatened that YMMF is infringing or otherwise adversely affecting the rights of any person with regard to any Intellectual Property Right.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 14















	4.15.


	            


	SEC Documents. YMMF has filed all reports, schedules, forms, statements and other documents as required by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") and YMMF has delivered or made available to Cardinal all reports, schedules, forms, statements and other documents filed with the SEC (collectively, and in each case including all exhibits and schedules thereto and documents incorporated by reference therein, the "YMMF SEC Documents"). The YMMF SEC Documents complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act of 19933, as amended (the "Securities Act") or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), as the case may be, and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder applicable to such YMMF SEC documents, and none of the YMMF SEC Documents (including any and all consolidated financial statements included therein) as of such date contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Except to the extent revised or superseded by a subsequent filing with the SEC (a copy of which has been provided to Cardinal prior to the date of this Agreement), none of the YMMF SEC Documents contains any untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state any material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The consolidated financial statements of YMMF included in such YMMF SEC Documents (the "YMMF Financial Statements") comply as to form in all material respects with applicable accounting requirements and the published rules and regulations of the SEC with respect thereto, have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (except, in the case of unaudited consolidated quarterly statements, as permitted by Form 10-Q of the SEC) applied on a consistent basis during the periods involved (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto) and fairly present the consolidated financial position of YMMF and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates thereof and the consolidated results of operations and changes in cash flows for the periods then ended (subject, in the case of unaudited quarterly statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments as determined by YMMF's independent accountants). Except as set forth in the YMMF SEC Documents, at the date of the most recent audited financial statements of YMMF included in the YMMF SEC Documents, neither YMMF nor any of its subsidiaries had, and since such date neither YMMF nor any of such subsidiaries has incurred, any liabilities or obligations of any nature (whether accrued, absolute, contingent or otherwise) which, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect with respect to YMMF.




	4.16.


	            


	Undisclosed Liabilities.  Neither of the YMMF nor any of its subsidiaries has any liability (whether known or unknown, whether absolute or contingent, whether liquidated or unliquidated and whether due or to become due), except for (a) liabilities shown on the balance sheet contained in the most recent Form 10-Q filed with the SEC, (b) liabilities which have arisen since the date of the balance sheet contained in the most recent Form 10-Q filed with the SEC in the ordinary course of business which do not exceed $1,000.00 in the aggregate and (c) contractual and other liabilities incurred in the ordinary course of business which are not required by GAAP to be reflected on a balance sheet.








	4.17.


	            


	Transactions With Affiliates and Employees.  None of the officers or directors of YMMF and, to the knowledge of YMMF, none of the employees of YMMF is presently a party to any transaction with YMMF or any subsidiary (other than for services as employees, officers and directors), including any Contract or other arrangement providing for the furnishing of services to or by, providing for rental of real or personal property to or from, or otherwise requiring payments to or from any officer, director or such employee or, to the knowledge of YMMF, any entity in which any officer, director, or any such employee has a substantial interest or is an officer, director, trustee or partner.



	 


	 


	 



	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 15


















	4.18.


	            


	Solvency.  Based on the financial condition of YMMF as of the Closing Date (and assuming that the Closing shall have occurred), (a) YMMF's fair saleable value of its assets exceeds the amount that will be required to be paid on or in respect of YMMF's existing debts and other liabilities (including known contingent liabilities) as they mature, (b) YMMF's assets do not constitute unreasonably small capital to carry on its business for the current fiscal year as now conducted and as proposed to be conducted, including its capital needs, taking into account the particular capital requirements of the business conducted by YMMF, and projected capital requirements and capital availability thereof, and (c) the current cash flow of YMMF, together with the proceeds YMMF would receive, were it to liquidate all of its assets, after taking into account all anticipated uses of the cash, would be sufficient to pay all amounts on or in respect of its debt when such amounts are required to be paid.  YMMF does not intend to incur debts beyond its ability to pay such debts as they mature (taking into account the timing and amounts of cash to be payable on or in respect of its debt).









	4.19.


	            


	Investment Company.  YMMF is not, and is not an affiliate of, and immediately following the Closing will not have become, an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.




	4.20.


	            


	Foreign Corrupt Practices.  Neither YMMF, nor to YMMF's knowledge, any director, officer, agent, employee or other person acting on behalf of YMMF has, in the course of its actions for, or on behalf of, YMMF (a) used any corporate funds for any unlawful contribution, gift, entertainment or other unlawful expenses relating to political activity; (b) made any direct or indirect unlawful payment to any foreign or domestic government official or employee from corporate funds; (c) violated or is in violation of any provision of the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended; or (d) made any unlawful bribe, rebate, payoff, influence payment, kickback or other unlawful payment to any foreign or domestic government official or employee.









	4.21.


	            


	Absence of Certain Changes or Events.  From the date of the YMMF Financial Statements to the date of this Agreement, YMMF has conducted its business only in the ordinary course, and during such period there has not been:









	(a)


	            


	any change in the assets, liabilities, financial condition or operating results of YMMF from that reflected in the YMMF Financial Statements, except changes in the ordinary course of business that have not caused, in the aggregate, a YMMF Material Adverse Effect;




	(b)


	            


	any damage, destruction or loss, whether or not covered by insurance, that would have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect;




	(c)


	            


	any waiver or compromise by YMMF of a valuable right or of a material debt owed to it;




	(d)


	            


	any satisfaction or discharge of any lien, claim, or encumbrance or payment of any obligation by YMMF, except in the ordinary course of business and the satisfaction or discharge of which would not have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect;




	(e)


	            


	any material change to a material Contract by which YMMF or any of its assets is bound or subject;



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 16







	 


	 








	(a)


	            


	any material change in any compensation arrangement or agreement with any employee, officer, director or stockholder;




	(b)


	            


	any resignation or termination of employment of any officer of YMMF;




	(c)


	            


	any mortgage, pledge, transfer of a security interest in or lien created by YMMF with respect to any of its material properties or assets, except liens for taxes not yet due or payable and liens that arise in the ordinary course of business and that do not materially impair YMMF's ownership or use of such property or assets;




	(d)


	            


	any loans or guarantees made by YMMF to or for the benefit of its employees, officers or directors, or any members of their immediate families, other than travel advances and other advances made in the ordinary course of its business;




	(e)


	            


	any declaration, setting aside or payment or other distribution in respect of any of YMMF's capital stock, or any direct or indirect redemption, purchase, or other acquisition of any of such stock by YMMF;




	(f)


	            


	any alteration of YMMF's method of accounting or the identity of its auditors;




	(g)


	            


	any issuance of equity securities to any officer, director or affiliate, except pursuant to existing YMMF stock option plans; or




	(h)


	            


	any arrangement or commitment by YMMF to do any of the things described in this Section 4.23.






	4.24.


	            


	Disclosure.  All disclosure provided to the Shareholders regarding YMMF, its business and the Transactions, furnished by or on behalf of YMMF (including YMMF's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement) is true and correct and does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.






	 




	4.24.


	            


	Disclosure.  All disclosure provided to the Shareholders regarding YMMF, its business and the Transactions, furnished by or on behalf of YMMF (including YMMF's representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement) is true and correct and does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.







	4.25.


	            


	No Undisclosed Events, Liabilities, Developments or Circumstances.  No event, liability, development or circumstance has occurred or exists, or is contemplated to occur with respect to YMMF, its subsidiaries or their respective businesses, properties, prospects, operations or financial condition, that would be required to be disclosed by YMMF under applicable securities laws on a registration statement on Form S-1 filed with the SEC relating to an issuance and sale by YMMF of its common stock and which has not been publicly announced.




	4.26.


	            


	No Additional Agreements.  YMMF does not have any agreement or understanding with the Shareholders with respect to the Transactions other than as specified in this Agreement.



	 


	 


	 


	 



	 




	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 17



















	ARTICLE V





	Conditions to Closing










	5.1.


	            


	YMMF Conditions Precedent.  The obligations of the Shareholders, Stakeholders and PURA to enter into and complete the Closing are subject, at the option of the Shareholders, Stakeholders and PURA, to the fulfillment on or prior to the Closing Date of the following conditions, any one or more of which may be waived by PURA and the Shareholders and Stakeholders in writing.









	(a)


	            




	Representations and Covenants


	. The representations and warranties of YMMF contained in this Agreement shall be true in all material respects on and as of the Closing Date with the same force and effect as though made on and as of the Closing Date.  YMMF shall have performed and complied in all material respects with all covenants and agreements required by this Agreement to be performed or complied with by YMMF on or prior to the Closing Date.  YMMF shall have delivered to the Shareholders and PURA a certificate, dated the Closing Date, signed by an officer of the YMMF, to the foregoing effect.




	(b)


	            




	Litigation


	.  No action, suit or proceeding shall have been instituted before any court or governmental or regulatory body or instituted or threatened by any governmental or regulatory body to restrain, modify or prevent the carrying out of the Transactions or to seek damages or a discovery order in connection with such Transactions, or which has or may have, in the reasonable opinion of PURA or the Shareholders, a materially adverse effect on the assets, properties, business, operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of YMMF.




	(c)


	            




	Consents


	.  All material consents, waivers, approvals, authorizations or orders required to be obtained, and all filings required to be made, by YMMF for the authorization, execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation by it of the Transactions shall have been obtained and made by YMMF, except where the failure to receive such consents, waivers, approvals, authorizations or orders or to make such filings would not have a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.




	(d)


	            




	No Material Adverse Change


	.  There shall not have been any occurrence, event, incident, action, failure to act, or transaction since the date of the PURA Financial Statements which has had or is reasonably likely to cause a YMMF Material Adverse Effect.




	(e)


	            




	Post-Closing Capitalization


	.  At, and immediately after, the Closing, the authorized capitalization, and the number of issued and outstanding shares of the capital stock of YMMF, on a fully-diluted basis, as indicated on a schedule to be delivered by the Parties at or prior to the Closing, shall be acceptable to PURA and the Shareholders.




	(f)


	            




	Satisfactory Completion of Due Diligence


	.  PURA and the Shareholders shall have completed their legal, accounting and business due diligence of YMMF and the results thereof shall be satisfactory to PURA and the Shareholders in their sole and absolute discretion.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 18















	(g)


	            




	Secretary's Certificate


	.  YMMF shall have delivered to PURA a certificate, signed by its Secretary or other authorized officer, certifying that the attached copies of the YMMF Charter, the YMMF Bylaws and resolutions of its Board of Directors approving this Agreement and the Transactions are all true, complete and correct and remain in full force and effect.




	(h)


	            




	Good Standing Certificate


	.  YMMF shall have delivered to PURA a certificate of good standing of YMMF dated within five (5) business days of Closing issued by the Secretary of State of Colorado.




	(i)


	            




	Resignations and Appointments


	.  YMMF shall have delivered to PURA (i) a letter of resignation from each director and officer of YMMF resigning from all of their respective positions effective upon the Closing and (ii) evidence of the election of such directors and officers of YMMF as may be designated by PURA, effective as of the Closing.




	(j)


	            




	Payoff Letters and Releases


	.  YMMF shall have delivered to PURA such pay-off letters and releases relating to liabilities of YMMF as PURA shall request, in form and substance satisfactory to PURA.




	(k)


	            




	Lien Searches


	.  If requested, YMMF shall have delivered to PURA the results of UCC, judgment lien and tax lien searches with respect to YMMF, the results of which indicate no liens on the assets of YMMF.




	(l)


	            




	Release


	.  YMMF shall have delivered to PURA a duly executed release by the current directors and officers of YMMF and by YMMF in favor of PURA and the Shareholders, in form and substance satisfactory to PURA.




	(m)


	            




	Issuance of Shares


	.  YMMF shall have issued the Shares to the Shareholders on the stock ledger of YMMF in accordance with


	Annex A


	and shall have delivered a copy of such stock ledger to PURA and the Shareholders.  At or within five (5)  business days following the Closing, YMMF shall deliver to each Shareholder a certificate representing the new shares of YMMF Stock issued to such Shareholder.




	(n)


	            


	Such other documents as PURA may reasonably request for the purpose of (i) evidencing the accuracy of any representation or warranty of YMMF evidencing the performance by YMMF, or the compliance by YMMF with, any covenant or obligation required to be performed

	 

	or

	 

	complied with by YMMF (iii) evidencing the satisfaction of any condition referred to in this Article V, or (iv) otherwise facilitating the consummation of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the Transaction Documents.









	5.2.


	            


	PURA and Shareholder and Stakeholder Conditions Precedent.  The obligations of YMMF to enter into and complete the Closing is subject, at the option of YMMF, to the fulfillment on or prior to the Closing Date of the following conditions, any one or more of which may be waived by YMMF in writing.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 19




















	(a)


	            




	Representations and Covenants


	.  The representations and warranties of the Shareholders, Stakeholders and PURA contained in this Agreement shall be true in all material respects on and as of the Closing Date with the same force and effect as though made on and as of the Closing Date.  The Shareholders, Stakeholders and PURA shall have performed and complied in all material respects with all covenants and agreements required by this Agreement to be performed or complied with by the Shareholders and PURA on or prior to the Closing Date.  Each of PURA and the Shareholders and Stakeholder shall have delivered to YMMF a certificate, dated the Closing Date, to the foregoing effect.




	(b)


	            




	Litigation


	.  No action, suit or proceeding shall have been instituted before any court or governmental or regulatory body or instituted or threatened by any governmental or regulatory body to restrain, modify or prevent the carrying out of the Transactions or to seek damages or a discovery order in connection with such Transactions, or which has or may have, in the reasonable opinion of YMMF, a materially adverse effect on the assets, properties, business, operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of PURA.




	(c)


	            




	Consents


	.  All material consents, waivers, approvals, authorizations or orders required to be obtained, and all filings required to be made, by the Shareholders, Stakeholders or PURA for the authorization, execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation by them of the Transactions, shall have been obtained and made by the Shareholders, Stakeholders or PURA, except where the failure to receive such consents, waivers, approvals, authorizations or orders or to make such filings would not have an PURA Material Adverse Effect.




	(d)


	            




	No Material Adverse Change


	.  There shall not have been any occurrence, event, incident, action, failure to act, or transaction since the date of the PURA Financial Statements which has had or is reasonably likely to cause an PURA Material Adverse Effect.




	(e)


	            




	Post-Closing Capitalization


	.  At, and immediately after, the Closing, the authorized capitalization, and the number of issued and outstanding shares of the capital stock of YMMF, on a fully-diluted basis, as indicated on a schedule to be delivered by the Parties at or prior to the Closing, shall be acceptable to YMMF.




	(f)


	            




	Satisfactory Completion of Due Diligence


	.  YMMF shall have completed its legal, accounting and business due diligence of PURA and the Shareholders and Stakeholders and the results thereof shall be satisfactory to YMMF in its sole and absolute discretion.




	(g)


	            




	Secretary's Certificate


	. PURA shall have delivered to YMMF a certificate, signed by its Secretary or other authorized officer, certifying that the attached copies of the PURA Constituent Instruments and resolutions of its Board of Directors approving this Agreement and the Transactions are all true, complete and correct and remain in full force and effect.




	(h)


	            




	Good Standing Certificate


	.  PURA shall have delivered to YMMF a certificate of good standing of PURA dated within five (5) business days of Closing reasonably satisfactory to YMMF.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 20















	(i)


	            




	Share Transfer Documents


	.  Each Shareholder shall have delivered to YMMF the original certificate(s) representing its PURA Stock, accompanied by a duly executed stock transfer power for transfer by the Shareholder of its PURA Stock to YMMF.








	ARTICLE VI



	Covenants









	6.1.


	            


	Blue Sky Laws.  YMMF shall take any action (other than qualifying to do business in any jurisdiction in which it is not now so qualified) required to be taken under any applicable state securities laws in connection with the issuance of the YMMF Stock in connection with this Agreement.









	6.2.


	            


	Public Announcements. YMMF and PURA will consult with each other before issuing, and provide each other the opportunity to review and comment upon, any press releases or other public statements with respect to this Agreement and the Transactions and shall not issue any such press release or make any such public statement prior to such consultation, except as may be required by applicable Law, court process or by obligations pursuant to any listing agreement with any national securities exchanges.









	6.3.


	            


	Fees and Expenses.  All fees and expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement shall be paid by the Party incurring such fees or expenses, whether or not this Agreement is consummated.




	6.4.


	            


	Continued Efforts.  Each Party shall use commercially reasonable efforts to (a) take all action reasonably necessary to consummate the Transactions, and (b) take such steps and do such acts as may be necessary to keep all of its representations and warranties true and correct as of the Closing Date with the same effect as if the same had been made, and this Agreement had been dated, as of the Closing Date.




	6.5.


	            


	Exclusivity.  No Party hereto shall (a) solicit, initiate, or encourage the submission of any proposal or offer from any person relating to the acquisition of any capital stock or other voting securities of YMMF or PURA (as applicable), or any assets of YMMF or PURA (as applicable) (including any acquisition structured as a merger, consolidation, share exchange or other business combination), (b) participate in any discussions or negotiations regarding, furnish any information with respect to, assist or participate in, or facilitate in any other manner any effort or attempt by any person to do or seek any of the foregoing, or (c) take any other action that is inconsistent with the Transactions and that has the effect of avoiding the Closing contemplated hereby.  Each Party shall notify the other immediately if any person makes any proposal, offer, inquiry, or contact with respect to any of the foregoing.




	6.6.


	            


	Access.  Each Party shall permit representatives of any other Party to have full access to all premises, properties, personnel, books, records (including Tax records), contracts, and documents of or pertaining to such Party.




	6.7.


	            


	Preservation of Business.  From the date of this Agreement until the Closing Date, each of PURA and YMMF shall, except as otherwise permitted by the terms of this Agreement, operate only in the ordinary and usual course of business consistent with its past practices and shall use reasonable commercial efforts to (a) preserve intact its business organization, (b) preserve the good will and advantageous relationships with customers, suppliers, independent contractors, employees and other Persons material to the operation of its business, and (c) not permit any action or omission that would cause any of its representations or warranties contained herein to become inaccurate or any of its covenants to be breached in any material respect.



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 21



















	ARTICLE VII





	Miscellaneous










	7.1.


	            


	Notices.  All notices, requests, claims, demands and other communications under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed given upon receipt by the Parties at the addresses set forth on the signature page hereof (or at such other address for a Party as shall be specified by like notice):




	7.2.


	            


	Amendments; Waivers; No Additional Consideration.  No provision of this Agreement may be waived or amended except in a written instrument signed by PURA, YMMF and Shareholders holding a majority of the Shares.  No waiver of any default with respect to any provision, condition or requirement of this Agreement shall be deemed to be a continuing waiver in the future or a waiver of any subsequent default or a waiver of any other provision, condition or requirement hereof, nor shall any delay or omission of any Party to exercise any right hereunder in any manner impair the exercise of any such right.  No consideration shall be offered or paid to any Shareholder to amend or consent to a waiver or modification of any provision of any Transaction Document unless the same consideration is also offered to all Shareholders then hold the Shares.




	7.3.


	            


	Termination.




	(a)


	            


	The Parties may terminate this Agreement as provided below:




	(i)


	            


	PURA, YMMF and a majority of the Shareholders may terminate this Agreement by mutual written consent at any time prior to the Closing;




	(ii)


	            


	YMMF may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to PURA and the Shareholders at any time prior to the Closing (A) in the event PURA or any Shareholder has breached any material representation, warranty, or covenant contained in this Agreement in any material respect, YMMF has notified PURA and/or the Shareholder of the breach, and the breach has continued without cure for a period of twenty days after the notice of breach; (B) if the Closing shall not have occurred on or before July 31, 2016 by reason of the failure of any condition precedent under Section 5.2 hereof (unless the failure results primarily from YMMF itself breaching any representation, warranty, or covenant contained in this Agreement); and




	(iii)


	            


	PURA may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to YMMF at any time prior to the Closing (A) in the event YMMF has breached any material representation, warranty, or covenant contained in this Agreement in any material respect, PURA has notified YMMF of the breach, and the breach has continued without cure for a period of twenty days after the notice of breach; (B) if the Closing shall not have occurred on or before July 31, 2016, by reason of the failure of any condition precedent under Section 5.1 hereof (unless the failure results primarily from PURA or any Shareholder breaching any representation, warranty, or covenant contained in this Agreement).




	(b)


	            


	If any Party terminates this Agreement pursuant to Section 7.3(a) above, all rights and obligations of the Parties hereunder shall terminate without any liability of any Party to any other Party (except for any liability of any Party then in breach).



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 22















	7.4.


	            


	Replacement of Securities.  If any certificate or instrument evidencing any Shares is mutilated, lost, stolen or destroyed, YMMF shall issue or cause to be issued in exchange and substitution for and upon cancellation thereof, or in lieu of and substitution therefor, a new certificate or instrument, but only upon receipt of evidence reasonably satisfactory to YMMF of such loss, theft or destruction and customary and reasonable indemnity, if requested.  The applicants for a new certificate or instrument under such circumstances shall also pay any reasonable third-party costs associated with the issuance of such replacement Shares.  If a replacement certificate or instrument evidencing any Shares is requested due to a mutilation thereof, YMMF may require delivery of such mutilated certificate or instrument as a condition precedent to any issuance of a replacement.




	7.5.


	            


	Remedies.  In addition to being entitled to exercise all rights provided herein or granted by law, including recovery of damages, each of the Shareholders, YMMF and PURA will be entitled to specific performance under this Agreement.  The Parties agree that monetary damages may not be adequate compensation for any loss incurred by reason of any breach of obligations described in the foregoing sentence and hereby agrees to waive in any action for specific performance of any such obligation the defense that a remedy at law would be adequate.




	7.6.


	            


	Independent Nature of Shareholders' Obligations and Rights.  The obligations of each Shareholder under this Agreement are several and not joint with the obligations of any other Shareholder, and no Shareholder shall be responsible in any way for the performance of the obligations of any other Shareholder under this Agreement.  The decision of each Shareholder to acquire the Shares pursuant to this Agreement has been made by such Shareholder independently of any other Shareholder.  Nothing contained herein, and no action taken by any Shareholder pursuant hereto, shall be deemed to constitute the Shareholders as a partnership, an association, a joint venture or any other kind of entity, or create a presumption that the Shareholders are in any way acting in concert or as a group with respect to such obligations or the transactions contemplated herein.  Each Shareholder shall be entitled to independently protect and enforce its rights, including without limitation the rights arising out of this Agreement, and it shall not be necessary for any other Shareholder to be joined as an additional party in any proceeding for such purpose.  Each of PURA and YMMF acknowledges that each of the Shareholders has been provided with this same Agreement for the purpose of closing a transaction with multiple Shareholders and not because it was required or requested to do so by any Shareholder.




	7.7.


	            


	Limitation of Liability.  Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, each of YMMF and PURA acknowledges and agrees that the liability of a Shareholder arising directly or indirectly, under any Transaction Document of any and every nature whatsoever shall be satisfied solely out of the assets of such Shareholder, and that no trustee, officer, other investment vehicle or any other affiliate of such Shareholder or any investor, shareholder or holder of shares of beneficial interest of such Shareholder shall be personally liable for any liabilities of such Shareholder.




	7.8.


	            


	Interpretation.  When a reference is made in this Agreement to a Section, such reference shall be to a Section of this Agreement unless otherwise indicated.  Whenever the words "include", "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words "without limitation".



	 


	 







	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 23















	7.9.


	            


	Severability.  If any term or other provision of this Agreement is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule or Law, or public policy, all other conditions and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect so long as the economic or legal substance of the Transactions is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any Party.  Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the Parties shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the Parties as closely as possible in an acceptable manner to the end that the Transactions are fulfilled to the extent possible.




	7.10.


	            


	Counterparts; Facsimile Execution.  This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, all of which shall be considered one and the same agreement and shall become effective when one or more counterparts have been signed by each of the Parties and delivered to the other Parties.  Facsimile execution and delivery of this Agreement is legal, valid and binding for all purposes.




	7.11.


	            


	Entire Agreement; Third Party Beneficiaries.  This Agreement, together with the Rescission Agreement (a) constitutes the entire agreement and supersede all prior agreements and understandings, both written and oral, among the Parties with respect to the Transactions and (b) are not intended to confer upon any person other than the Parties any rights or remedies.




	7.12.


	            


	Governing Law.  This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of California, regardless of the laws that might otherwise govern under applicable principles of conflicts of laws thereof, except to the extent the laws of Colorado are mandatorily applicable to the Transactions.




	7.13.


	            


	Assignment.  Neither this Agreement nor any of the rights, interests or obligations under this Agreement shall be assigned, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise by any of the Parties without the prior written consent of each of the other Parties.  Any purported assignment without such consent shall be void. Subject to the preceding sentences, this Agreement will be binding upon, inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by, the Parties and their respective successors and assigns.







	[

	Signature Page Follows

	]


	 


	 



	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 24











	IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Share Exchange Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized signatories as of the date first indicated above.











	 


	 




	 



	YUMMY FLIES, INC.





	 


	 




	 


	 




	 




	By:


	                                                                      






	 



	Name:





	 



	Title:





	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 



	PURA NATURALS, INC.





	 


	 




	 


	 




	 




	By:


	                                                                      






	 



	Name:





	 



	Title:





	 


	 




	 


	 




	 



	SHAREHOLDERS:





	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 



	STAKEHOLDERS:





	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 




	 


	 







	 


	 


	Exhibit 2.1 --  Page 25


	 


	 



	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 25







	 


	 












	ANNEX A



	Shareholders and Stakeholders of PURA













	 


	Name and Address of Shareholder




	Number of Shares of PURA Stock Exchanged




	Percentage of Total Shares of PURA Stock




	Number of Shares of YMMF Stock Received






	Advanced Innovative Recovery Tech




	 7,650,000




	51.00%




	 3,196,170






	Action You




	 500,000




	3.33%




	 208,900






	Advanced Materials Technology, Inc.




	 250,000




	1.67%




	 104,450






	The AAA Switzer Trust




	 100,000




	0.67%




	 41,780






	NXTGen Pet




	 1,731,000




	11.54%




	 723,212






	Anderson, Erik




	 2,000




	0.01%




	 836






	Hurd, Michael & Patricia




	 20,000




	0.13%




	 8,356






	Fuchs, Arnold




	 60,000




	0.40%




	 25,068






	McLain, A. and Donald




	 40,000




	0.27%




	 16,712






	Haas, Orin K & Nancy




	 40,000




	0.27%




	 16,712






	Storms, Jolene




	 90,000




	0.60%




	 37,602






	Starr, Robert & Judy




	 20,000




	0.13%




	 8,356






	Benson, John (Skip)




	 75,000




	0.50%




	 31,335






	Schuller, Pete




	 30,000




	0.20%




	 12,534






	Villesvik, Ed




	 2,000




	0.01%




	 836






	Morrisette, Michele (Morrisette McKie LLC)




	 88,000




	0.59%




	 36,766






	Morrisette, Michele




	 26,000




	0.17%




	 10,863






	Sowers, Allison (Morrisette daughter)




	 30,000




	0.20%




	 12,534






	Thom, Richard or Peggy




	 100,000




	0.67%




	 41,780






	McEdwards, Don




	 40,000




	0.27%




	 16,712






	Greder, Greg




	 20,000




	0.13%




	 8,356






	Scofield, Dann




	 180,000




	1.20%




	 75,204






	 


	 


	 


	 





	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 26







	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	Name and Address of Shareholder




	Number of Shares of PURA Stock Exchanged




	Percentage of Total Shares of PURA Stock




	Number of Shares of YMMF Stock Received









	Winston, Darl




	 40,000




	0.27%




	 16,712






	Martin Rebecca




	 30,000




	0.20%




	 12,534






	Kurt and Carol Uphoff




	 20,000




	0.13%




	 8,356






	Redeker, Perry




	 170,000




	1.13%




	 71,026






	Axtell, Teresa




	 20,000




	0.13%




	 8,356






	Skott, Craig




	 60,000




	0.40%




	 25,068






	Murphy, James




	 100,000




	0.67%




	 41,780






	Scheid, David




	 6,000




	0.04%




	 2,507






	Holland, Murry




	 10,000




	0.07%




	 4,178






	Farthing, Wayne




	 14,000




	0.09%




	 5,849






	Shores, Linda




	 10,000




	0.07%




	 4,178






	Braska Films




	 10,000




	0.07%




	 4,178






	Schoendienst, Paul




	 100,000




	0.67%




	 41,780






	Gardner, Dennis




	 80,000




	0.53%




	 33,424






	Gardner, Dennis




	 200,000




	1.33%




	 83,560






	Rist Family Trust




	 167,000




	1.11%




	 83,560






	Franqui, Kenneth




	 5,000




	0.03%




	 2,089






	Candice, Nguyen




	 40,000




	0.27%




	 16,712






	Lysa Gaye Switzer Trust




	 400,000




	2.67%




	 167,120






	Robert Switzer




	 300,000




	2.00%




	 125,340






	Action You




	 700,000




	4.67%




	 292,460






	Advanced Materials Technology, Inc.




	 550,000




	3.67%




	 229,790






	Woodward, Tim




	 70,000




	0.47%




	 29,246






	Hightower, Andrea




	 40,000




	0.27%




	 16,712






	Doherty, Patrick




	 40,000




	0.27%




	 16,712






	Doherty, Matthew




	 80,000




	0.53%




	 33,424






	 


	 


	 


	 





	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 27







	 


	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	Name and Address of Shareholder




	Number of Shares of PURA Stock Exchanged




	Percentage of Total Shares of PURA Stock




	Number of Shares of YMMF Stock Received









	Carrillo, Pete




	 22,500




	0.15%




	 9,401






	Doherty, Nicole




	 22,500




	0.15%




	 9,401






	O'Brien, Michael




	 40,000




	0.27%




	 16,712






	Banister, Brad




	 275,500




	1.84%




	 115,104






	Feffer, Michael




	 20,000




	0.13%




	 8,356






	Osborn, Beau




	 1,500




	0.01%




	 627






	Slama, Anthony




	 5,000




	0.03%




	 2,089






	McDougall, Micheal




	 2,500




	0.02%




	 1,045






	Ant Hill Retail Group




	 10,500




	0.07%




	 4,387






	Kiesow, Robert




	 1,500




	0.01%




	 627






	Woods, Susan P.




	 25,000




	0.17%




	 10,445






	Doherty, Kevin




	 5,000




	0.03%




	 2,089






	Wuensch, Brenda




	 12,500




	0.08%




	 5,223






	TOTALS




	15,000,000




	100%




	6,267,000





























	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 28








	 


	 



	 


	ANNEX B



	Definitions








	"


	Action


	" means any action, suit, inquiry, notice of violation, proceeding (including any partial proceeding such as a deposition) or investigation pending or threatened in writing before or by any court, arbitrator, governmental or administrative agency, regulatory authority (federal, state, county, local or foreign), stock market, stock exchange or trading facility.





	"


	Code


	" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.





	"


	Consent


	" means any material consent, approval, license, permit, order or authorization.





	"


	Contract


	" means any contract, lease, license, indenture, note, bond, agreement, permit, concession, franchise or other instrument.





	"


	Exchange Act


	" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.





	"


	GAAP


	" means United States generally accepted accounting principles.





	"


	Governmental Entity


	" means any federal, state, local or foreign government or any court of competent jurisdiction, administrative agency or commission or other governmental authority or instrumentality, domestic or foreign.





	"


	Intellectual Property Right


	" means any patent, patent right, trademark, trademark right, trade name, trade name right, service mark, service mark right, copyright and other proprietary intellectual property right and computer program.





	"


	Law


	" means any statute, law, ordinance, rule, regulation, order, writ, injunction, judgment, or decree.





	"


	Lien


	" means any lien, security interest, pledge, equity and claim of any kind, voting trust, stockholder agreement and other encumbrance.





	"


	PURA Bylaws


	" means the Bylaws of YMMF, as amended to the date of this Agreement.





	"


	PURA Charter


	" means the Articles of Incorporation of YMMF, as amended to the date of this Agreement.





	"


	SEC


	" means the Securities and Exchange Commission.





	"


	Securities Act


	" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.





	"


	Taxes


	" means all forms of taxation, whenever created or imposed, and whether of the United States or elsewhere, and whether imposed by a local, municipal, governmental, state, foreign, federal or other Governmental Entity, or in connection with any agreement with respect to Taxes, including all interest, penalties and additions imposed with respect to such amounts.





	"


	Tax Return


	" means all federal, state, local, provincial and foreign Tax returns, declarations, statements, reports, schedules, forms and information returns and any amended Tax return relating to Taxes.





	"


	Transaction Documents


	" means this Agreement and any other documents or agreements executed in connection with the Transactions.







	            


	"


	YMMF Bylaws


	" means the Bylaws of YMMF, as amended to the date of this Agreement.







	"


	YMMF Charter


	" means the Articles of Incorporation of YMMF, as amended to the date of this Agreement.


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 29







	 


	 



	 


	SCHEDULE 3.3






	Kordenbrock:



	 


	Jim Kordenbrock has an option to purchase 750,000 number of PURA shares at $0.001 per share.   The option is immediately exercisable.  The option will be assumed by YMMF and the number of option shares will be adjusted by the exchange rate used in the Agreement such that 313,350 YMMF will be issuable thereunder.


	           


	           


	Doherty:







	Bob Doherty has an option to purchase 375,000 number of PURA shares at $0.001 per share.   The option is immediately exercisable.  The option will be assumed by YMMF and the number of option shares will be adjusted by the exchange rate used in the Agreement such that 156,675 YMMF will be issuable thereunder.






	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 



	Exhibit 2.1 -- Page 30


















YUMMY FLIES, INC. IPO - NASDAQ.com


































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO Overview





YUMMY FLIES, INC. IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
YUMMY FLIES, INC.


Company Address
1848 SOUTH LAMAR COURTLAKEWOOD, CO 80232


Company Phone
303-619-2503


Company Website
www.yummyfiles.com


CEO
Gary Okizaki


Employees  (as of 8/20/2013) 
3


State of Inc
CO


Fiscal Year End
12/31


Status
Filed (12/15/2010)


Proposed Symbol
 -- 


Exchange
OTCBB


Share Price
$0.05


Shares Offered
1,989,000


Offer Amount
$99,450.00


Total Expenses
$40,668.00


Shares Over Alloted
0


Shareholder Shares Offered
1,989,000


Shares Outstanding
10,278,000


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
 -- 


Quiet Period Expiration
 -- 


CIK
0001501257




We will receive none of the proceeds from the sale of the Common Stock issued 
and held by our Selling Stockholders in this Offering.


We face extreme competition from larger, better-financed and national brands. 
All of these companies have extensive resources and a world market place for 
their products. Also, there are local fly shops that are established retail 
centers that could have an impact on our ability to penetrate the fly tying and 
fly pattern industry.


Company Description
We were incorporated on December 26, 2005, in the State of Colorado under the
name “Yummieflies.com, Inc.” In March 2010 we filed an amendment to our Articles
of Incorporation changing our name to “Yummy Flies, Inc.” Since inception we
have been engaged in marketing and selling our fly fishing ties


 that have been
developed by our management. The cost of our products is higher than customary
due to the amount of time it takes to produce our ties, as well as the quality
of raw material utilized. Each of our flies is hand crafted in order to look
like the bugs that fish feed upon. Our management believes that customary over
the counter flies are mass produced with thread and feathers, fur or hair. Our
marketing efforts to date have been limited by our limited available capital.
 
Our principal marketing efforts have been by word of mouth, including exposure
of our products at area fly tying clinics where our management has been and
continues to be invited to appear about six times per year, as a cost free
featured tier at local fly shops where these shops have promoted their
appearance in order to allow them to demonstrate their fly tying abilities. We
also have marketed our products through our website and to a limited extent, our
participation at various industry shows.  Messrs. Okizaki and Coleman, two of
our officers and directors, are professional fishing guides and have introduced
our flies to their patrons on their fishing excursions.  Mr. Yamauchi has given
them to friends and acquaintances, including our shareholders that fish. Based
upon the response we received initially from the fisherman on these excursions
and other friends and family members we decided to attempt to initially market
our products on a regional basis throughout the Rocky Mountain area, an
established trout fishing region.
 
The most important attribute of our flies that needed to be initially determined
was simply that they had to catch fish regardless of the level of competency of
the fisherman. We examined answers to several questions, including (i) were the
flies successful in catching trout, our target species, and did they catch fish
regardless of who was fishing them, and (ii) more importantly, did the fisherman
fishing our fly’s think they were worth the extra cost and would they buy
them? We believe the Natural Fly selection was a success for all fishermen under
varied weather conditions, water conditions and light. These results are our
opinion only and there were no formal independent tests conducted on any of our
flies. There are no assurances that future performance will be consistent with
the initial results. Even if the fishermen who thought our flies were worth the
extra cost and they would purchase our flies, there are no assurances they will
actually do so. When we provided samples of our flies to other fisherman and
when these ties were used by our management, the Natural Flies caught, on
average, more trout than the fisherman who used them had caught on other
patterns. In these situations our Yummy Tandem Flies and Canyon Magic caught
less fish that when the Natural Fly ties were used, but still caught fish. There
can be no assurances that these results will be duplicated in the future.

---

Our executive offices are located at 1848 South Lamar Ct., Lakewood, CO 80232, 
telephone (303) 619-2503. Our website: www.yummyfiles.com.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
$422


Net Income
-$823


Total Assets
$1,084






Total Liabilities
$23,165


Stockholders' Equity
-$22,081




Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 7 Total: 7
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
424B1
8/20/2013
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
8/2/2013
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
6/26/2013
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
2/4/2013
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
12/17/2012
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
8/2/2012
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1
12/15/2010
Filing







Experts


Auditor
Ronald R.  Chadwick, P.C


Company Counsel
Andrew I. Telsey, P.C


Transfer Agent
 -- 


Underwriter
 -- 






                                There are no news stories for this IPO at this time.
                            












Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6374.68


-7.51
 ▼ 
0.12%





DJIA

21830.31


33.76
 ▲ 
0.15%





S&P 500

2472.10


-3.32
 ▼ 
0.13%










Data as of Jul 28, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Sprint proposes merger with Charter Communications - WSJ
                        



	                     7:53PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Union cheers as trucks kept out of U.S. self-driving legislation
                        



	                     6:57PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            RPT-Hundreds of U.S. counties at risk for no Obamacare insurer in 2018
                        



	                     6:48PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Wells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncovered
                        



	                     6:41PM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX
















































YUMMY FLIES, INC. IPO: News - NASDAQ.com

































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO News





YUMMY FLIES, INC. IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
YUMMY FLIES, INC.


Company Address
1848 SOUTH LAMAR COURTLAKEWOOD, CO 80232


Company Phone
303-619-2503


Company Website
www.yummyfiles.com


CEO
Gary Okizaki


Employees  (as of 8/20/2013) 
3


State of Inc
CO


Fiscal Year End
12/31


Status
Filed (12/15/2010)


Proposed Symbol
 -- 


Exchange
OTCBB


Share Price
$0.05


Shares Offered
1,989,000


Offer Amount
$99,450.00


Total Expenses
$40,668.00


Shares Over Alloted
0


Shareholder Shares Offered
1,989,000


Shares Outstanding
10,278,000


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
 -- 


Quiet Period Expiration
 -- 


CIK
0001501257




We will receive none of the proceeds from the sale of the Common Stock issued 
and held by our Selling Stockholders in this Offering.


We face extreme competition from larger, better-financed and national brands. 
All of these companies have extensive resources and a world market place for 
their products. Also, there are local fly shops that are established retail 
centers that could have an impact on our ability to penetrate the fly tying and 
fly pattern industry.


Company Description
We were incorporated on December 26, 2005, in the State of Colorado under the
name “Yummieflies.com, Inc.” In March 2010 we filed an amendment to our Articles
of Incorporation changing our name to “Yummy Flies, Inc.” Since inception we
have been engaged in marketing and selling our fly fishing ties


 that have been
developed by our management. The cost of our products is higher than customary
due to the amount of time it takes to produce our ties, as well as the quality
of raw material utilized. Each of our flies is hand crafted in order to look
like the bugs that fish feed upon. Our management believes that customary over
the counter flies are mass produced with thread and feathers, fur or hair. Our
marketing efforts to date have been limited by our limited available capital.
 
Our principal marketing efforts have been by word of mouth, including exposure
of our products at area fly tying clinics where our management has been and
continues to be invited to appear about six times per year, as a cost free
featured tier at local fly shops where these shops have promoted their
appearance in order to allow them to demonstrate their fly tying abilities. We
also have marketed our products through our website and to a limited extent, our
participation at various industry shows.  Messrs. Okizaki and Coleman, two of
our officers and directors, are professional fishing guides and have introduced
our flies to their patrons on their fishing excursions.  Mr. Yamauchi has given
them to friends and acquaintances, including our shareholders that fish. Based
upon the response we received initially from the fisherman on these excursions
and other friends and family members we decided to attempt to initially market
our products on a regional basis throughout the Rocky Mountain area, an
established trout fishing region.
 
The most important attribute of our flies that needed to be initially determined
was simply that they had to catch fish regardless of the level of competency of
the fisherman. We examined answers to several questions, including (i) were the
flies successful in catching trout, our target species, and did they catch fish
regardless of who was fishing them, and (ii) more importantly, did the fisherman
fishing our fly’s think they were worth the extra cost and would they buy
them? We believe the Natural Fly selection was a success for all fishermen under
varied weather conditions, water conditions and light. These results are our
opinion only and there were no formal independent tests conducted on any of our
flies. There are no assurances that future performance will be consistent with
the initial results. Even if the fishermen who thought our flies were worth the
extra cost and they would purchase our flies, there are no assurances they will
actually do so. When we provided samples of our flies to other fisherman and
when these ties were used by our management, the Natural Flies caught, on
average, more trout than the fisherman who used them had caught on other
patterns. In these situations our Yummy Tandem Flies and Canyon Magic caught
less fish that when the Natural Fly ties were used, but still caught fish. There
can be no assurances that these results will be duplicated in the future.

---

Our executive offices are located at 1848 South Lamar Ct., Lakewood, CO 80232, 
telephone (303) 619-2503. Our website: www.yummyfiles.com.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
$422


Net Income
-$823


Total Assets
$1,084






Total Liabilities
$23,165


Stockholders' Equity
-$22,081




Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 7 Total: 7
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
424B1
8/20/2013
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
8/2/2013
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
6/26/2013
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
2/4/2013
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
12/17/2012
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1/A
8/2/2012
Filing



YUMMY FLIES, INC.
S-1
12/15/2010
Filing







Experts


Auditor
Ronald R.  Chadwick, P.C


Company Counsel
Andrew I. Telsey, P.C


Transfer Agent
 -- 


Underwriter
 -- 






                                There are no news stories for this IPO at this time.
                            












Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6374.68


-7.51
 ▼ 
0.12%





DJIA

21830.31


33.76
 ▲ 
0.15%





S&P 500

2472.10


-3.32
 ▼ 
0.13%










Data as of Jul 28, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Sprint proposes merger with Charter Communications - WSJ
                        



	                     7:53PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Union cheers as trucks kept out of U.S. self-driving legislation
                        



	                     6:57PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            RPT-Hundreds of U.S. counties at risk for no Obamacare insurer in 2018
                        



	                     6:48PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Wells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncovered
                        



	                     6:41PM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX










































YMMF Stock Quote - Yummy-Flies-Inc Summary - Quicken® Investing Center







| Quicken
















 












Skip to main content






Quicken Logo




Quicken Logo








United StatesCanada

 



            Cart            



Sign InMy Account
Investment Portfolio

 









You are here









Loading... 









